An air cleaner or purifier is only as good as the air filter it uses. And no, one size does not fit all. Find out about the family of air filters available to consumers and how each one deals with certain kinds of pollution such as allergens, dust mites, bacteria, viruses, micro-organisms, smoke, chemicals, odors, etc.
This organization has high marks from Charity Navigator. Go check out their sponsorship program and if you feel like you can't afford to sponsor someone, do you think you can find someone who can?
The kids are also just as vulnerable as everyone else in the game. While they will try and run from fights, they can still be killed in crossfire and there’s nothing stopping you from even stabbing or shooting them and taking their possessions. And these kids, these vicious little murderers, often carry medicine.
~2 15oz cans of Chickpeas, drained (aka-Garbanzo beans)
Here are a few more photos of the brewery:
- That's not a bad idea Party Time. Not at all is that a bad idea. Cos that's all you need, right? The 'Long Number', the name, valid to – and – from, all what you'll get of the phone-photo of the front of it...and that security number yiv got written down. Then we'll go online and buy up a loada shit. Sell it down in Cash Convertors, what we don't want! Fuckin hell, you big cunt, that's the first brilliantly criminal thing yiv come up with, despite yer gangster leanings. Goddamn! I may be starving, but this deserves a fitting tune, cousin!!! We'll think of HOW we do it when we've something in our bellies and our energy's up!
From her nickname, Spicy, you might imagine that my friend has fair skin, fiery hair and a hot blooded Irish temperament. She couldn’t be more different. Instead imagine the girl-next-door with a sweet spirit, wavy brown hair and a slightly Mediterranean /Middle Eastern complexion. Like my nickname, Grace, hers is ironic. Our nicknames were given to us by Cornerstone’s philosophy professor Dr. Bonzo, somewhat as a joke, during a philosophy conference we went to in our undergrad. Having agreed that it’s weird having a friend with the same name, we prefer our nicknames.
I look behind me, inside the undergrowth, and search for a large stick or something. All I find is the remains of a burnt out scooter and some discarded condoms.
Ecovillages
Mi Roo and Michelle go head to head on the moral issue of assigning “Sofia” to go out with Goo Young Ho. Especially since Michelle knew that Mi Roo was Sofia. I am a little torn on this issue. Mi Roo is an adult and ultimately it is her decision to make. However, I do think it was wrong for Michelle to push this onto Mi Roo for financial reasons. Sure in the end, Goo Young Ho turned out to be harmless but I do feel a boss should protect her employees. Not because their both women but for the integrity of the position she holds as the boss. Especially since they work in journalism. I know that some rich people assume that money could buy them anything but the buck should have stopped with Michelle as the editor. What’s next? They dictate what should be reported in the magazine? Oh yeah, that’s apparently why KBS and MBC employees are on strike. I lived with Bush 2.0 and it only takes someone who isn’t afraid of the rich and powerful and won’t allow them to abuse their power.
funds for Atlantic Yards.
This effort of major oil companies banning together to try and create “independent data” on tar sands seems like a last ditch effort to try and greenwash the industry. COSIA even went so far as remarking that although they will be independent of CAPP they feel CAPP will be supportive of their research and work. Of course they will be and already are. CAPP has been working as hard as the tobacco industry did by exploring any and all efforts to disprove the negative impacts of their respective industries. CAPP has highlighted COSIA on their homepage with a link directly to COSIA’s “independent” site.
And especially to David Kira who once again, made this all possible .. Thank you Brother!
- Language: in your native language is totally OK, which will add more fun (but please with an English translation too, so that I can put a subtitle next to it), English is of course OK
Do you have food stored for you and your family? For a week? For a year?
2. * The Christian Theological Tradition with general editors Catherine A. Cory & David T. Landry, Simon & Schuster Custom Publishing, 1996, 435 pages
8. The Black Album (1994)
Overall, a very different feel to the first-generation Pet. It's hard to describe, but you feel it when you hold it. The parts are heavier and have a more solid feel to them (except for the aluminum hood). It feels more like a "real" camera, and even has a somewhat less retro look to it than the Pet-2. The Pet-2 isn't a lesser build, it's just lighter and feels a bit more 1960s, while Pet-1 has more of a 1950s feel.Pet-2 does seem a bit cheaper when held alongside Pet-1, but this is probably because it was cheaper to make. Which do I prefer? Pet-2, most definitely. Pet-1 has a few issues that make it less fun to use, such as the hood and the window cover. Also, the bulb switch is very loose, something I'm told is common for these models. Makes for a lot of blurry photos. There doesn't seem to be any correlation between glass and plastic lenses and older and newer Pets. I don't know the reason for that particular variation.
she asked me what happened...
Would you join me and my sister today, and the coming days, by praying Psalm 34:1, 4 for my mama?
Now if you have a blow torch, you don't have anything to worry about. But for people like me who don't own one, the oven comes in handy, and fetches the same result as a blow torch. I must admit, however, that the first time I tried it, I managed to literally burn the cream. I turned around for a couple of seconds to clear my kitchen counter and there I could already smell the burnt caramel and it was torturous trying to get it off my pretty ramekins. The second time I watched it like a hawk and came up with beautiful, even caramel topping. So here I shall explain in detail how to go about the process (since I'm kinda jobless right now) :)
At the counter you can see the sweets and treats displayed. There is one of my new quilts hanging on the wall behind the sorbet. That's "Crossroads" on the left, (made with Sorbet Garden fabrics) and the new "Petal Pushers" on the right.
The Awful Truth
I'm sure my eyes bugged and my mouth gaped or maybe that's me embellishing the way I felt. I should tell you that my friend is actually our friend. Mine and Jack's. His loyalties lie to the good of our relationship and not to either of us specifically more than the other.
8. Lilies produce large quantities of pollen. To remove pollen from clothes lightly brush off the pollen with a toothbrush or a craft pipe cleaner,
as the pianist sits
We will shame and expose them for what they really are
this group
And lay there wide-a-fucking-wake because I FINALLY had you in my bed and I knew I wouldn’t sleep with you.
I had lunch at Panera Bread with my mother-in-law Maria
Here's what the kids get to do:
Roasted Fiedler Farms Pork Shoulder + Blue Cheese Biscuit & Green Peppercorn
For those of us in the Catholic tradition, that is exactly what the Sacraments of Reconciliation and Eucharist provide – a place to draw near to Him – place where we may ask and receive!
Big Lettuce to wrap up the turkey
And now both of them are snuggled down in bed, totally conked out.
(Health warning attending the CVA’s may cause a complete loss of voice from cheering, rip your hands to shreds clapping, melt the eyes from their sockets if your male from the beautiful EP and ROTR hosts if your female well can anyone say Snaaaaaaaakkkkkkeeeeee!!!!!!!!! , do not attend if you are prone to anxiety attacks, are a bad parent, suffer from heart problems or of course epilepsy. Consult Doctor Mario before attending, come at your own risk!)
“It’s a shame that having ­already landed the taxpayer with a hefty legal and benefits bill, this man can siphon yet more money from the public purse.”
I'm so excited to be able to share some news with you! Starting in April I will be joining the Lawnscaping Design Team. If you're not familiar, it's a challenge blog with a focus on Lawn Fawn. I'll be stepping out a little and focusing on scrapbook layouts for the challenges, which I am excited about since I have thousands of pictures to scrap. I'm thrilled to join such an amazing group of ladies.
Oh, no cannonballs did fly, no rifles cut us down
Causes: desperation, the belief that one's goal is the only thing worth pursuing, ambition, a need to prove oneself (to others or to oneself), a stubborn nature, obsession, having learned through experience that persistence pays off in the end
You know, it would be cool if I could figure out how to post the widget that links me to the rest of the people who are blogging about the conference during the conference. Oh well, I'll try to figure it out again later.
But dumb till that dread day when Orc assay’d his fierce embrace.
But what about you? Do YOU believe in ghosts? Had any spooky encounters you'd like to share? I'll give away a signed copy of Book 1 in the Nicki Styx series, DEAD GIRLS ARE EASY, plus a special Limited Edition beaded bookmark and a tin of coffin mints to one lucky commenter. Good luck!
MY THOUGHTS
2. Can't Get Enough
It’s an inspiring place. It inspired Noel Coward to write Blythe Spirit while he was staying there. Film makers have used it as a location, no doubt because it is here and nowhere at one and the same time, suggestive of different times and other dimensions. It was used once in an episode of Doctor Who, the long-running BBC sci-fi series.
Does this happen to anyone else? Are there studies that prove my theory?
42 THERE are 300,000 child soldiers fighting in conflicts around the world.
Rain's supposed to descend upon California tonight, but oh, the weather last week has been sunny, sunny, and sunnier... aka it was perfect weather to take advantage of our huge balcony and throw a nice little dinner.
...I know that's only five things I master at (or whatever) but I have to pee and I'm really lazy (see above) so I'm gonna have to end it here b/c I just can't hold it anymore and....oh shit...ok. well, thanks alot Sarah! I guess I'll be able to finish now but I'm also going to have to get a new couch Overstock.com! Six months from now! Soooooo....
If you like to run, you should take a look at running shoes, trail running shoes, or “barefoot shoes.” Prefer to walk? Grab some walking shoes. If you are more of the dancing type, you’ll want shoes that can glide on the studio floor and if you’re into a mix of activities, a cross-training shoe will be your best bet. Take a look at the four main types of shoes below to get a better idea of what might be right for you.
Jade is a believer of positive thinking. If you believe in something enough, it will happen. Many times her words have made my day, changed my attitude, and made me feel all around better.
I will have to do something about my migraines, though, as they are completely out of hand. God only knows what, as the doctors have put me on pill after pill that didn't work, already. $342 for 10 fucking pills, if you can believe that. Thank God it's not me paying for it.
Although the day started out on a note of calm routine, the climate in Bamako has been tense since late morning, for reasons that remain unclear. As with previous days of unrest, our first warning sign came from our son’s daycare staff: around 11:40 this morning, they phoned to tell us they’d be closing early due to “troubles in town.” (At least we got him out of the house for 3 hours today.)
By this point, my body’s up for whatever mileage I force on it.
Wow, time seriously does fly...especially with a newborn! I can't believe that Laurel is 8 weeks old today. I guess she isn't really a newborn anymore...
1. Why do so many mean/abusive parents have sweet, lovable kids (is it really all about making sure they grow up insecure enough that they beat themselves up trying to please)?
I would like to go to Conclusions, but you have to jump. I’m not too much on physical activity anymore.
And while Tom and I both love more foods than we ever knew existed (I mean, we fight over kale and Brussel sprouts), we still have our individual preferences.
You know the scenario – your computer is down. You call the IT guy. He comes over and ‘re-boots’ it by hitting the on/ off switch. Then he looks at you with a face that says, “I didn’t know they still made people this stupid.”
So, today our challenge is to use pastels. There was a time when that's pretty much all I used. It was what I was comfortable with, and I seldom reached beyond my comfort zone at that point. Now, though, I really had to stretch to go toward the pastel palette.
5 -Medium 25mm Creme Mulberry Open Roses "WOC"
Baking Soda - 1 tbsp.
I was watching a YouTube video of Led Zep’s ‘The Battle of Evermore’, where John-Pail Jones performs the role made famous by Sandy Denny. It reminded me of the old joke:
“What we do know is that the Red Cross and local government are preparing for mass evacuations of thousands of residents in case of a “national security event”, barricades are being set up to control traffic in and out of the city, city highways and streets are being completely shut down to restrict any non-official access, mass detention centers are being prepared to hold hundreds of detainees, and heavily armed security teams will be deployed weeks ahead of the summit to acclimate residents to the militarization of their city.
This took a long time, during which I swept the floor, read about Christopher Hitchens’ death and worried about the implications of the (so far hilarious) trans-Manche slagging match. I have, in the loosest sense of the term, met both Fillon and Baroin, so the whole disastrous saga is for me a bit like watching the street next to mine getting hit by bubonic plague. Hilarious.
Rebecca Hall, Vicky Cristina Barcelona
...and even though I won't be cooking this holiday, for those of you who need a little inspiration for Easter food, make sure to check out my recipe section for a few ideas. I Love the meyer lemon crepe cake, blueberry ricotta pastries, and honey brie puffs for some easy brunch bites and a memorable dessert.
Can there be any possible justification for a war on terrorists in the Middle East while our borders remain wide open to terrorists and drug smugglers? Does anyone believe a government which passes immigration legislation and then refuses to enforce it would enforce the next bill either? There is a profound difference between being a nation of legal immigrants who immigrate legally, retain some of their culture, but transfer their loyalty to the United States, and a nation filled with illegal immigrants, many of whom have no desire to become part of American society. We have MS-13 gangs in at least 235 American cities, importing drugs and violent crimes. We have approximately 10 million Social Security numbers which are being fraudulently used, including many by illegals, and our elected officials lay awake at night, trying to come up with ways to reward this behavior. Our immigration system is broken, but it wasn’t broken by Americans. Apparently Americans won’t be allowed to fix it either.
Second: As we are all aware there are many companies that have a high turn over of staff regularly. This should be an automatic warning sign to BEWARE when asking for a reference from them! I have also worked for companies where the office staff would NEVER give a good reference for anyone. Yes this was an “attitude office” that needed better management but there was a revolving door for the higher management also…so the office morale and the company numbers suffered for it both ethically AND financially. Yet the company let it happen? In a larger company it is always someone elses job (the issue will just keep getting passed to others lower in the company later) to find out what is happening and why…so someone who may have nothing to do with a problem will turn into the “Fall Guy” for the problems/issues and when the problems/issues persist it may go to yet another innocent victim until someone finally takes initiative and gets down to the source of the problems/issues.
3:
B.) Irish
In the winter of 2007, I organized my first GNO (girls Night Out) at a little club named Lydia's in Akron Ohio. Lydia's was an LGBT "choose your label" type of bar - perfect for many first time out shy TGirls. I organized many more GNO's after that and also some outings to theater shows, Dinners and even BBQ's at my own home.
and stacking smaller diameter pieces into a trailer.
which proves us to be the Lord’s.
Here is our creation.
From “The Man From Skibbereen”
By Dennis Abrams
God has BOLDLY revealed Himself so many times throughout this journey and continues to do so every day. He speaks to me through my husband, my family, my friends and even complete strangers through messages on this blog. Complete strangers who have recognized us and took the time to let us know they’re following along on our blog and praying for us. I had another one of those moments this morning at my doctor visit. (Thank you, Jenny!!!) Through these instances, God reminds me just how far Nora’s story has reached, how many people she’s touched and how truly MEANT TO BE she really is.
whose projects are most certainly destined for the pages of a magazine (s).
Applications for the next cycle of Arts Project Grants will be due Oct. 1, 2012. For more information on the Bloomington Arts Commission or its grant program, visit http://bloomington.in.gov/bac. For more information, contact Miah Michaelsen, Assistant Economic Development Director for the Arts, at michaelm@bloomington.in.gov or 349.3534.
As I was standing there, taking my time and giving careful consideration and thought to my purpose, I could feel that I was being watched, and after tossing in the last penny, I looked to my side and there were three lovely young girls of Asian origin; I'd venture an educated guess at Korean, who were watching me very intently. I knew they were trying to ascertain the scene before them, staring in fascination while trying not to be invasive.
The oldest known plant louse fossils date back to the Carboniferous period (354 to 290 million years ago). The winged plant louse trapped in amber in the picture is 45 million years old. Fossils like this one, which show that these animals have not altered at all since the moment they first came into being, are also proof that they never evolved.
State prosecutor Werner Gibson asked Moyo why he had not alerted anyone that he was being threatened.
I have to dip into my geek soul a moment, too, and express my prior trepidations. Early indications were the Joker’s origin was going to be changed from a crook scarred and made insane by a plunge into toxic chemicals to a psycho in clown make up. It sounded like one of those changes comic book fans are prone to burn creators in effigy for trying to pull off. Mercy, he is going to be played by the guy from Ten Things I Hate About You, to boot!
4: Add the bottle of beer, it will foam nicely to start, stir well and scrape any caught caramelised bits from the bottom of the pan.
This was quite an honour to actually hold the Olympic Torch and to meet John, who gave me quite a few tips on my walking program.
I could spend hours looking at everything. Here’s just a small part of the chutney and pickle section:
Clearly this officer is not the brightest porch light on the block, but the entire episode brings up something we’ve written about on MyBrownBaby on more than one occasion: Police officers and kids just do not go together. It’s simply asking for way more trouble than it’s worth.
plus shipping/handling.
There’s that cold spell that hits us during the pre-holiday weeks that typifies winter, and above all, Christmas. The mad rush and clamor that is Brooklyn still prevails, but now folks are glad to be hurried, for it warms their bodies and makes their skin tingle…
The unbelievably horrific news of an incident of a video recording taken of a girl being gang-raped has been in circulation in virtual spaces. I’m so infuriated and sickened, and deeply concerened about the future of my people. I’m actually lost for words more than anything.
So cue massive the parties and sales of ice cream and jelly reaching record levels, even if it is still snowing.
(The GHOST OF CHRISTMAS FUTURE materializes in a puff of smoke. It is – RONALD REAGAN.)
If one considers compulsive overeating, obesity and the fat acceptance movement, there is much overlap. Plethoras of studies show that obesity is harmful to the body, yet this community of people choose to “glorify” being fat. I accept this choice for them and their lives, but one could reasonably argue that those people are being just as self-destructive as anorexics and bulimics. In fact, people argue this all the time. There is reasonable debate on fat acceptance just as there is debate on calorie restriction.
He chuckled, “What do you mean?”
This brought to mind a recent discussion on another blog (possibly Dick Puddlecote) about the “100 unit week” and to what extent that was normal or even achievable. While it’s not something I’d recommend doing every week, it’s a level I suspect many people attain when on holiday or over the Christmas period without feeling at all that they are drinking heavily. The key is to do it regularly and steadily, and to drink at lunchtime as well as in the evening to spread it out more.
“It's the little details that are vital. Little things make big things happen.”
The problem with women like me, is that we have so many choices and so many dreams and so many ambitions that we have a hard time seeing clearly. It’s like all the freedom that our grandmothers and maybe even mothers, didn’t have all of a sudden unleashed upon us giving us an unusual restlessness in our souls. Bad decisions can lead to bad choices and therefore, bad consequences and I think this has been my issue with my love life.
He also pointed out that the contents of the nine dry casks at the Fukushima Daiichi site were undamaged by the disaster.
So much for normal.
Hello there blog friends! How was your weekend? Hope you had a good time. It seems to just fly right by, doesn't it? It was a nice and relaxing one over here...just wish it was a little L O N G E R . Well, I've got a fun sneak peek today - it's the project I created for U Stamp With Dawn and Friends Big Shot Roundup! I had fun playing with the Matchbox die, Flower folds die and edgelits! For the complete instructions as well as 40+ amazing Big Shot project ideas, pop on over to UStamp With Dawn and Friends!
The Taste: OH, MY, SANDVICH!!! This is probably the best thing I’ve eaten at taco bell! Seriously! Unbelievable! I never thought — Got dang! So many wasted years eating crap! *sob*
We did find a church. It was a good church. It's a big church in Portland and I still appreciate all the work they do and the influence they have. God definitely is there. But I wan;t allowed to help. I wasn't a part of the ocmmunity. And God remained silent.
+ just finished the first episode of new downton abbey. is it just me or was anyone else crying throughout almost the entire thing? hmm.
I believe in America. I’ve seen it on satellite photos and heard Aaron Copland’s music. People whom I trust say they have been there. Apart from a vacuous slogan, the man most likely to come second in November has some vacuous beliefs.
With minimal ventilation, conditions were suffocating, dark and damp even in the dry and hot Angolan climate.
Beat me outta that woman and left me stone broke.
And before I get in trouble, I better wish my aunts a Happy Mother's Day also!!!!!!!!
Legendary American folk singer Richie Havens will also perform on Saturday, bringing his internationally renowned intensely rhythmic guitar style to the festival for the first time. The man who opened Woodstock in 1969 to continuous ovations, Richie’s unconventional style has inspired generations of musicians the world-over.
Oldest Living Lineage Of Ants Found In Amazon – “A new species of blind, subterranean, predatory ant discovered in the Amazon rainforest by University of Texas at Austin evolutionary biologist Christian Rabeling is likely a descendant of the very first ants to evolve . . . Ants evolved over 120 million years ago from wasp ancestors. They probably evolved quickly into many different lineages, with ants specializing to lives in the soil, leaf-litter or trees, or becoming generalists.”
Restaurants: Any dinners out or restaurant take-out purchases.
(Frits Gierstberg)
the compass gimbaled in your heart.
Here again, reality has us at a disadvantage. If I had an actor as a character in a novel, even a comic novel, I wouldn't name him something like "Rip Torn." But Mr. Torn (whom I admire) is only the latest in a family of Torns where the older males were nicknamed "Rip." In life, it's a conversation starter. In a book, it would be a bit silly and distracting (cf. Benny Profane).
UK LOCAL COUNCIL ELECTIONS: PROCESS AND ANNOUNCEMENT OF RESULT
He would not say how long drivers have to complete a left turn or how long pedestrians have to cross the street, and how those times compare to other intersections.
Running Skirts
There was good reason for that. In the army camps out bush, those who didn't attend church services on Sundays had to work in kitchen duties, the protestant religions attended a service with-in the camp but the Catholics were transported into town and always had about three hours in the town.
I didnt want her to get raped, I didnt want her to be unsafe.
At the conclusion of your day greater effort you add into your visual appeal the harder it’s going to present about the big event.
The Kingdom could not be restored at that time because of the hardness of heart of the nationIsrael. One day it will be restored. In the meantime God is dealing with us by His grace. Salvation is offered to all who will accept the Lord Jesus Christ as personal Lord and Saviour and His completed work on the cross. He died for our sin. We are not to claim a Gospel that has been set aside. We are not looking for a Kingdom today. The Gospel of the Grace of God is the one Gospel for today and it is preached to both Jew and Gentile.
Percent Contained: 65%
Never Let Me Go is a gorgeous example of prolonged innocence. While intricately composed and wickedly clever as it develops into a dystopian novel, Ishiguro's expert hand has also brought us a gentle and touching story, full of quiet country lanes and long wistful gazes that mask the brutal complexity of hidden emotion and tumultuous relationships that pervade our brief glimpse into the characters life. Great stuff.
SUBBING!? Yeah i won't get into the nitty gritty of how and why...
EGMONT was founded 130 years ago in Copenhagen, Denmark, and has since grown into a global company with offices in London, New York and Sydney. All the offices are known to work closely together. Apart from being the biggest children’s book publisher in the UK, they are also the No. 1 character publisher in the UK (more about this later).
While there are murmurings of “forcing bondholders to share the pain,” any future haircut will undoubtedly be just for show, while the Irish pension funds are gutted to bail out the banks.
Last Friday was my fiancée and I’d five-year anniversary. Early on we would celebrate the day of our first date (April 20) with a road trip. We went to Chicago and Philadelphia. The third year was a busy one and we couldn’t get the time off, instead we visited Baie St. Paul, an artsy little town in Eastern Quebec. Our fourth year, it was impossible to get any time off at the same time for reasons I won’t get into and we didn’t go anywhere. It seemed that all the crazy stuff we’d said we’d always do no matter the circumstance all fell to the wayside as life bulldozed by. But things are more settled now and we decided to visit Boston, another great American city, this August to celebrate our anniversary of getting engaged. It’s not until August. For our actual anniversary, we stayed in and enjoyed a drink together and made a delicious meal.
_____You may have stolen my heart and broke it....but that's Ok...just keep it. That's not the part I'm going to be using to bang all your friends with anyways. (funny heart quote status)
Which is why I try to keep the guilt away while happily watching, discussing, laughing over, learning from, and enjoying my favorite TV shows.
2011 like 2007 has been a year of growth, many hits, plenty of falls and too much down time but I’ve come out the other side another person, hopefully stronger. There was plenty of loss in 2011, friends and family, yet I feel that my peoples continuance to another realm mirrored my own. Learning from my loved ones that this life is about enjoying it to the last moment, loving unconditionally, being happy and positive, and always to looking forward. Ok, so I did talk a little about 2011…
Safer
You may have noticed all of the roses here this morning. Pop Pop remembers how much Mom Mom loved roses. He told me last night that he started when they got married giving her one rose and each year would give her another until they just became too expensive. After 59 years, I can understand that.
One of the unconstitutional findings (relative to the "seizure/forfeiture bond") by the Honorable Judge Simpson was that:
Tourists flock to Italy needs to be active after your wedding in Italy, then the art hotel florence italy and seek out small towns and more have popped up to submit their suitability as the art hotel florence italy to death. Each place you visit Rome, spend at least 10% of the art hotel florence italy to suit all tastes. Saint Peter's Square is one such area. It is the art hotel florence italy is well-understood in the art hotel florence italy as alive and vivid as the art hotel florence italy of its modern day rich variety and culture.
began to wonder if we would choose an enthusiastic member of a painting-by-numbers club to judge the Turner prize.'
Guarapad Blood Pressure is suitable for people with high blood pressure, hypertension, stress.
After about 2km I passed a young girl, who was just coming back from injury. She said that her back was a bit sore but that she was ok, so I continued on my way.
It's so elementary, but we cannot miss the love and the blessings that are given to us through a relationship with Jesus. Jesus is real. Just to reiterate, JESUS IS REAL. He comes to us in our real hopelessness, our real discontentedness and literally lifts us out of them. His jealous love will not leave us abandoned to the World. And just to reiterate, Jesus is real. And so is a relationship with Him. It's not a metaphor. It's not just a nice idea. The person of Jesus makes relationship with God real and His Spirit is inside of us; only this kind of passion can fulfill a passion-craved World.
Malema said unemployment was the cause of recent political unrest, and nationalisation was the way to solve it.
02
It’s been three years since it all started. They asked me to come across the ocean, back to that place, where I was both given life and my name.
1 and 2 sourced from Factory UK 45 RPM 12" single FAC 163
Super Bowl weekend was spent in st.george attending the wedding of one of Tim's childhood best friends. it was nice to go someplace warm, visit Tim's awesome grandparents, and see Todd & his family again. the girls were rockstars in the car. Tim and I always marvel how blessed we've been with good little car travelers. no nook or phone was needed. they just quietly played with a few toys and required only a few potty breaks :)
My phone rang in my hand before Id gathered myself or rolled my mat. Her husband called and in an ironic twist, given the circumstances, we struggled to understand one another through the crackle and hiss of bad reception. She was in the bathroom, he couldn’t mover her, the baby was coming….This is a moment that I both fear and relish in a single rush of adrenaline. Ready, set, go…..I was running.
And the fact that our Moms went to the same college... creepy, right???
Anyhoo, do y'all have any good contemporaries to recommend? 'Cause I'm all ears. :)
My mom, however, shot down my plans pretty swiftly. “You are not going to see that. My friend at work told me a dog gets eaten, and a dead man is floating in the water with no eyes.”
Since it is May 1st, it is time for a new In Focus theme and I have the honor of announcing it!
While the $148.9 million offering meets the requirements for the IMB’s 2010 operating budget, it doesn’t allow room for growth or reversal of budget cuts.
The folks who are trying to get everything they can out of their system that they feel may no longer be socially acceptable once they hit 30.
The May 21 prediction came from the Biblical numerology of Harold Camping, an 89-year-old televangelist who owns the Oakland, Calif.-based Christian Family Radio network.
This means they have flexibility in the ingredients they choose, but – they have to stick to a budget. So, using the prawn cocktail example, Shelina could have done a spicy prawn & mango salad, but if she wanted to use Madagascan King Prawns, she would have to think carefully about how many mangoes she could afford. Do you follow?
Yes purple that does spell.
We were extremely concerned to learn of the receipt issue in New York. This act goes against our company values, and we've confirmed with the franchisee that this matter was addressed immediately and that the employee is being terminated. We are truly sorry for this customer's experience.
It was my third time at Malice and the best one yet. I had a wonderful time seeing old friends, making new ones, and meeting readers. Thank you to everyone who organizes this celebration of the traditional mystery each year.
Day 13 - Invite someone to dinner that you normally would not.
have in my heart. I said I would get another
reflects last night
Next up...the guys get ready
This suggests to me that there are real benefits in any decision making when we can find ways to keep it about the decision. That’s what a secret ballot is all about. I’ve been harping on the idea that people don’t want the best decision, they want their decision to be best. Well, this is one way to remove the “their” part of the equation so that the group can focus on the best decision.
1 tablespoon cilantro, chopped
The new year's seen lots of new ventures in the local home education scene: board games clubs; drawing classes; French groups; a proposed teen club. And DD has joined both the young archaeologists' club and a creative writing group that has been going some time. On top of her musical activities every weekend. She's certainly not short of opportunities to socialize.
L’s mouth sucking me; L’s ass relaxing to let me inside; the sparks that pass between us inside her cunt. I always wish. When we had just started and we were new to each other, and all I imagined. All I feared. L has a tiny vertical hairline scar that crosses the line of her lips, marking her.
Lunch at the L&L drive inn in Laie. We shared the Hawaii BBQ mixed plate (Hawaiian Barbecue beef, chicken, & short ribs with two scoops of rice and a scoop of macaroni salad), which was filling and tasty.
Subgenre: Chicklit
Relieved, this too had passed by.
Don’t even get me started on my whole ‘respect for the dead’ spiel, because it wouldn’t end. I cannot stand people’s need to defame and slander another person’s name when they deserve forgiveness for their past mistakes. Death is a punishment in some countries. It’s often considered the most severe, and certainly the most final of all sentences. Should the dead not be given a moments peace removed from their minor misdeeds and drama?
I think a two year old would be able to know the difference between rabbit droppings and cat faeces and I asked them how the drivers could be enlightened about it. After a long think, the rather polite man I was speaking to asked if I could put a note on my bin saying that it was rabbit bedding and nothing to do with cats. The man was very apologetic and said he was writing quite a severe complaint to the drivers.
Cream together the butter, brown sugar and cinnamon until well mixed and smooth.
Yes, I actually used the paint app to draw the overhead view of what that tiny living space looked like. I mean it was nice enough, but still. It was only one of a few living spaces built into the same building.
This is not subtle, but explaining it is difficult because it is almost impossible to see if one is not attuned to this kind of propaganda. But, to an Englishman who has been made to feel guilty from birth for our history, it was plain. A Jewish friend in America emailed me in some distress and, to be sure she had got it right, I asked what situations the Jewish character is shown in. As soon as she said exploiting Blacks I knew she had spotted something important because that is how we English are made to feel guilty, by negative stereotypes, which destroy the humanity of a select group and dehumanises them. Once that takes hold, anything can be done to them because they cease to be seen as human. Once this is explained, it's plain.
Alright- enjoy the freebie! I'd love a happy note if you enjoy it! How do you do interventions in your school? As this is our first go at cross grade level interventions, I'm sure we'll be tweaking it for next year. I'd love to know what you think! How do you make sure you're moving kids and keeping your groups fluid?
I've played this collection often, and I've sort of considered it one of my 'mind bubblebaths.' I don't tend to fixate or concentrate on the actual music much, but it creates a cloud of sound that I find very appealing. I'm sure there are some major musical point or accomplishments that I'm totally missing here, but something about the spirit of the recordings has definitely burrowed in my brain.
The girl was probably between 10-12 years old. She came up to me shaking and wide-eyed. “Wow!” she cried.
The yesteryears have withered like whirling wasps in the wind. Our romantic blitz has been reciprocating for sixty-eight months (and counting) already and still, we quench for more. Like the mornings that provide new beginnings, together we are the ever-complicated molecules of a biological ventilation.
Repetitive strain injury – RSI.
The Hawks, public protector, South African Revenue Service (Sars) and the Master of the High Court are finalising forensic investigations into the extent of Malema’s wealth and the role of his family trust in benefiting from Limpopo government tenders.
Sunday January 31st
And pain in my body returned.
And there’s no reason why this kind of communication can’t also leave people with the same positive feelings towards a brand as communication that only attempts to generate positive feelings. (For how to do this, see PART 1, CREATIVITY & CRAFT.)
There’s a voice inside my head sayin,
Hail to the One Who Brings Back Life–Rejoice! You are praised!
I had a midwife appointment on Wednesday. I know I complain a lot about the care I've been receiving and this is no different. I was in the waiting room for about 10 minutes, got called back by a nurse who took my weight and blood pressure, and then she took me back in the back to wait for the midwife. I saw my midwife for a total of 5 minutes! She asked if I've had any bleeding, I told her no but I had those contractions last week and she just said they were normal and dropped the subject. She then measured my belly, asked about my weight gain and told me I'm doing the glucose test in two weeks. After that she might as well have pushed me out the door because she made me feel like our 5 minutes was up and I had to go. With the huge rush I totally forgot about a few questions I had for her. So I left the appointment kind of upset, but unfortunately there's nothing I can do about any of it. No civilian doctors are going to take me this late in my pregnancy. Another thing the midwife mentioned was that she was going to see me in two weeks (and the only reason it's two weeks was because the front desk people messed up and didn't schedule my glucose test for the current appointment so they had to schedule it in two weeks) after my glucose test appointment she would see me four weeks after that, then four weeks after that, then two weeks and two weeks. I googled last night when most people start seeing their midwife/OB every two weeks in the pregnancy and it usually starts at week 28 and then at week 36 they want to see you once a week!!!! If I went to a doctor that followed those timelines then I would see my doctor another 9 times or so before my due date. My midwife only wants to see me 5 times before my delivery!!! Not to mention, it won't even be the same midwife each time. Oh well, at least I know better for the next time we get pregnant- I refuse to go through the naval hospital!!! Sorry, enough ranting about how horrible they all are. At least Jaxon is healthy and growing stronger each day.
ADG the Only-est-ish-esque.
Above: An osprey. Those things were common as dirt last weekend. It gave me hope for the future.
“They’re waiting out in cyberspace
Happy New Year,
The biggest problem with Parenthood is that it all feels very been there, done that; and not just because it’s based on a movie, but because the screenwriters don’t seem to be able to think of a storyline that hasn’t been told a dozen times before. Peter Krause even tells his dad (Craig T. Nelson) at one point “we’re not raising him the way you raised us.” Add that to Dax being a slacker not ready for kids and it feels like the plot was regurgitated up by a giant super computer designed only to spit out clichés. Basically the whole thing can be summed up by saying the world ‘family’ while shrugging your shoulders and shaking your head because family is just so dang crazy sometimes.
We females have a harder time losing weight than our male counterparts (those lucky dogs!). Oftentimes people are too impatient and throw in the towel when they don’t see results! It’s so important that you don’t do this! Weight loss is a patience game! Sometimes it just takes time to see all your hard work pay off! As the old adage goes, “slow and steady wins the race!” That crash, 3-day “detox diet” that’s guaranteed to make you lose 10 lbs in 3 days? Don’t believe it. While it might be good for a last minute high school reunion or if you desperately want to fit back into a dress for a big party, but just be prepared the next week to see that you’ve gained most (if not all) of it back. These quick fixes are nothing more than a temporary fix. It is mostly water weight and crap floating around your intestines that you’re body would’ve gotten rid of eventually. The problem with crash diets is that they’re not sustainable for true weight loss (aka fat loss). Oftentimes you gain back MORE than what you lost in the first place!
Nice to start blogging after a break…. Had a wonderful time in India…. A lot of shopping, traveling and food. Was back 2 weeks before. My little one is getting settled slowly, he is missing Chennai a lot….
The newly gazetted Peaceful Assembly Bill was meant to guarantee our constitutional right to assemble peacefully. Those who breach public order destroy public property must be dealt with the full force of the law. However, those who have assembled peacefully have committed no crime, were victimised with shocking ruthlessness and many were wrongfully arrested.
- Diplomacy
Well, fear not kids! I'm helping you get what you want...more of me! No seriously, go check out my latest article up at The Indie Chicks right now and feel free to show me a little comment love pretty pretty please!
GUEST DESIGNER IN THE SPOTLIGHT
740 D-XI/6/1976. “The Constitution of the State of Illinois.” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Starved Rock State Park, Illinois.
Iron Man/Tony Stark (Robert Downey Jr.)- Wonderful! He is a little old to be called hot, but his acting was great as always. He had several funny moments not to be missed!
Preheat the oven to 180C and bake for 15 minutes. Mix some chopped rosemary and sea salt into a tablespoon of olive oil and brush this over the top of the bread. Put it back in the oven for another 10-15 minutes until golden brown.
We'll see. Maybe, when we're all ready, we can get together.
Let’s summarize the proposals for Limited Government, as numbers are relatively easy to analyze. They see that the Federal Government has run large deficits for decades (esp under real accounting). The proposed solution is the Underwear Gnomes Business Plan (Wikipedia, video).
But I love the idea of pushing through
We are a 3 part being – body, soul & spirit our soul is made up of our mind, emotion and will. (I don’t want to into a doctrinal tussle here – let’s say this is a way of describing it) Actually its our perceptions that tends to focus our will. You’re driving along a road the sunlight is coming through the tree branches. Suddenly you see a dark patch near the side of the road. Your brain will process this as a pot hole you move to miss it. It was actually a stain on the road surface. That’s perception working.
Despite the devoted obstruction of the Collinsville PD, Huff -- who owns a small, independent film production company called T-Minus Entertainment-- obtained the dashcam video of the episode. He used it to produce "Breakfast in Collinsville," a brief and thoroughly infuriating documentary of Reichert’s attempted
Oct 3 - Star Bar - Atlanta, GA
We are hoping to try another walk this weekend - I think we are surprised at how much we enjoy them - exploring somewhere new, spending time together chatting away from TV, computers, bears etc - but boy are we always exhausted when we get back!!
(c) Faith-Rose Ansah
Congratulations Ladies! Be sure to take your winners blog badge from the side of the blog and email me at khasheck@gmail.com so I can get you in touch with the sponsor to redeem your prize. To visit any of our wonderful sponsors, or to visit any of the winners blogs, just click on their names.
The new challenge over at the STAMPOTIQUE challenge blog is to make a non-traditional Christmas card. Well....I sometimes struggle with these types of challenges... THO I LOVE ALL of these non-trad cards , I also have a very strong Catholic faith. Therefore, I feel pretty "traditional " when it comes to Christmas cards.
Our next destination was at a tranquil looking space along Geylang Serai. Here, we were introduced to Jamu massage. Somehow I could not quite figure what Jamu is, so I went to check out wikipedia and found out this: "Jamu is traditional medicine in Indonesia." Interesting, I learnt that many of the herbal medicine used in Jamu are natural materials, many of them are food that we eat.
Sheets and pillows fill my mind,
in the back of his neck, and a spinning sensation
Chariss saw the massacre of her family when she was four years old. The sorcerer Jamieson Drake would have killed her back then, too, if Hrazon of Mon’dore, the greatest wizard the gods created hadn’t shown up and whisked her off to safety. He’s been her guardian, mentor, teacher, and constant companion ever since. The perfect love and respect these two have for each other is amazing to me. It’s based on 1 Corinthians 13:4 and The Master Rothahn alludes to this in CHOICES MEANT FOR GODS. He seems almost jealous of it when He first mentions it, and that deadly sin of envy only grows.
I’m reading a collection of essays about pop culture titled Pulphead by John Jeremiah Sullivan. Although I haven’t finished reading the essays, so far, my favorite piece is the fascinating and insightful, “The Last Wailer.”
A memory of….what? Did his creator lose interest? Forget? Die?
Be encouraged, friends! Have a great week!
The Adamson Falcons wasted its twice-to-beat advantage and lost to the FEU Tamaraws in their do-or-die UAAP semifinals match Sunday. Sources say the Falcons were not able to sleep, and for 24 hours, they kept asking themselves, “What has happened to us?” That’s the same question the UP Fighting Maroons have been asking themselves for the last 25 years.
Jennifer Jason Leigh (Single White Female)
Her Noise: Feminisms and the Sonic runs from Thursday 3rd of May-Saturday 5th of May at the Tate Modern. Dr Cathy Lane is a composer, sound artist, lecturer, researcher and co-director of CRiSAP (Creative Research in Sound Arts Practice). For comprehensive information please visit:
2-Freedom
Skjoldebrand-Sparre L, Tolfvenstam T, Papadogiannakis N, Wahren B, Broliden K, Nyman M. Parvovirus B19 infection: association with third-trimester intrauterine fetal death. Br J Obstet Gynaecol 2000; 107: 476-480.
1 tablespoon vanilla
I wish sometime someday to dance with the leaves
Blog on peeps!
Your whole being.
Money in itself has lost all value that it once carried. For example, money used to be made from precious metals, usually stamped with the likeness of the Leader of the City or Country, or the royal coat of arms. This is because only the royal family of the area would have money, often gifted to the noblemen of the areas for deeds done. Earlier still, currency would consist of precious stones; gems and other shiny objects.
My financial success does not require hard work….
It takes my sister some time to cross the stage, so we are calm when she finally reaches my father, who stands with hands folded just as he did on the day of his own graduation, serious and proper. She passes her green velvet hood to him, turning to face the audience as the deans have instructed each graduate ahead of time, then bends at the knees slightly, as if curtsying, so my father can place the hood over her head from behind. Even so, he knocks her cap slightly askew. She grins as she straightens it, and -- is it possible? -- seems to look directly at us as we wave. I wonder if my father can see us too.
26 Brynwood (off Round Hill right on the Merritt), Sold for $6.275 in June, 2002, asked $7.8 in 2007 dropped to $4.75 this past October, and has a contract.
hi everyone! how i have missed you! we're having such an amazing time here in albuquerque, and i can't wait to tell you about it.
This just takes a couple minutes of prep work the night before. Then you can pack this up for an easy breakfast at work or a quick breakfast before you leave for work.
On the first day of the Olympics.
30 pullups, 15 second L- sit
My poor friends were all in need of early nights due to long shifts in a hotel/hospital/lab - but I'm a bad influence and even got Natalie on the two-for-one cocktails.
This activity has lots of different variations depending on the level of your tot. For some, it could simply be that they "build" their own name or the alphabet. For others, they might "build" sight words or word families. You know your tot best, adapt this activity appropriately for them.
6. resign and buy at least 25% of my employer. For kicks.
Comfort in the Day -The believers at Thessalonica had a measure of knowledge concerning the end times. However, that portion had led them to believe that the dead were at a disadvantage at Christ’s return compared to those who were living. It is unclear whether they believed that those who died before Christ’s return forfeited resurrection completely or that they merely would miss out on the event itself. It is clear, however, that their eschatology was deficient and that, through correcting it, Paul sought to provide them with comfort in their sorrows and sufferings.
Surprise, surprise.
for the protection of the public welfare, health, peace and morals of the people of the Commonwealth and to prohibit forever the open saloon, and all of the provisions of this act shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of this purpose. Yeah, that's it. See, they're protecting our welfare, health, peace, and morals. And prohibiting forever the open saloon, whatever the hell that means. So, it's, like, worth it, right?
I would literally choke to death on my own cheapness to have to pay someone to do my hair, or hold my shoes for me.
are no more
And within the next two days I get a mail from the man himself – ‘Your bottle must have touched so many shores of different planets before it was fished by Rita in a German space shore’. Irshad quoted Firaq to convey his feelings at hearing from someone he didn’t ever think he could - Urdu poets have a couplet for every thing, don’t they.
The ability to intentionally modify a deadly virus, to make it more contagious within and between human populations, suggests that we may be entering an entirely new phase in human bio-warfare. Nature's editorial staff debated the issue prior to the decision to go ahead with the publication of the risky research.
Abstract – Three hundred and twelve (312) African workers’ contribution to the construction of the contemporary Caribbean civilisation were explored through statistical and qualitative analysis of the 1817 British Colonial Office census of the Wingfield Sugar Plantation, Old Road, St Kitts. The occupational lives of 101 young children – 50 girls and young women and 51 boys and young men, aged 16 years and under; and 201 adults – 117 women and 94 men aged 17 years and above, once explored in terms of name, occupation, age, gender and place of birth, revealed the African-centered education and training philosophy underpinning the workplace knowledge, skills and experiences which drove the social and economic development of Caribbean sugar plantations, such as Wingfield. The research found a community of practice – a team of workers at different stages of becoming and being, from apprentice to expert – within all occupations. The arguments here are that, these communities of practice ensured the transmission of the knowledge, skills and experiences necessary to be productive workers. That in the absence of western learning institutions, under enslavement, with absentee landowners, and overseers fresh from England – without knowledge, skills or experience of project management, never mind the management of a vast sugar plantation – it is within these communities of practice that African workers learnt their occupational credentials.
Dear Grace,
Unfortunately for Smith (and us), a film like this needs a rock-solid center for the zaniness of the rest of the film to work against. Smith has an incredibly likable and personable persona, but the film would’ve been better toning Smith’s charm down and being the straight man to all of Sonnenfeld’s gags. Instead, Smith and Sonnenfeld conspire to have Jim West be the super-cool, self-contained gunslinger in one scene and the “I can’t believe this is happening!” screamer in the next. Compare that to Kline’s take on President Grant, who stoically stands there, facing down Loveless’ giant steampunk spider while everyone else runs away screaming. With Smith’s West, there’s just too much performance in the performance, and if he could have toned down his act, and made us believe in this character’s quest for revenge …
LEGEND and LORE: Opal is a birthstone for October.
The basement also offered another area to do arts and crafts as well as several bunnies that could be taken out of their cage, and a music area with a piano, bongos, and some other types of drums. While our visit unfortunately was hampered by rain, there are also outdoors nature walks as well as an underground railroad walk that we were told is very educational. Along the nature walk, several different types of wildlife are frequently seen in the surrounding areas. Despite not being the newest or fanciest of attractions, at 3 dollars per person, and after spending several hours having fun with our friends, we are definitely planning a trip back when the weather warms up.
And don’t forget if you intend on fighting such charges, you might not be able to rely on evidence of your own. In the state of Illinois, videotaping the police, under current law, brings criminals charges. Don’t fret. It’s not like the country will really try to enforce it — right?
So, I thought I might as well pop over to my blog and share some random musings with everyone. You lucky people!! ;-) And something I've been wondering about all day today (for some reason) is whether or not there are other writers out there like me - those that never, ever switch off. I mean, surely I can't be the only one out there with an inability to relax? Because, no matter how hard I try, I just cannot chill out. And I do try - and, I have to say, Britain's Got Talent semi-final week is doing a sterling job of trying to take my mind off all things literary this week, (would be better if there weren't adverts every five minutes, but I do love Ant & Dec...) by giving me something to whinge about, mainly, (not Ant & Dec though) but, that aside, I just can't switch off. I can't. Can't do it.
If you wish to send a contribution, please read and follow the submission guidelines, if only to avoid annoying me before I even open your email. Seriously. It's amazing how few people take the time to follow magazine submission guidelines, yet still expect the editor to read their work at the other end in a generous and professional spirit.
I’ll try it again either tomorrow or the day after. There are plenty of other things to do. A book needs to be written. Cleaning needs to happen. A family needs to be subtly taken care of from the shadows
Other stuff: Lacy was a backup infielder for the Dodgers throughout the 1970s before becoming a role player with the Pirates in the '80s and then a starter later in his career with Pittsburgh and Baltimore.
The overall theme of the conference is The Challenge for Graduates in a Changed World. Within this, specific topics will include:
SHU IS NOW HITLER
What I don’t understand.
(6) 2 5mx1.5m cotton white sheets
Although this empire is infinitely more powerful than Rome was, it will likely suffer the same fate. For every negative action the empire commits, there’s an equal and opposite good reaction. And the goodness of humanity will always defeat tyranny when it goes too far. However, an empire with so much to lose will go down swinging and slinging every weapon in its arsenal, thus putting the final stamp on their status as most brutal empire in history.
1 teaspoon mustard powder
Don’t we all crave for something sweet when we’ve hit rock bottom? I sure do… I target ice cream when I am feeling low.. I would like something creamy and home made and I am looking for the right dish…
This is why I always smile. In my head there’s only one though: ” I LOVE PEOPLE.” And even when people are trying really hard ton be unlovable…I still do. I just let them have a really hard time trying to do unlovable things and push fearfully all this wisdom away. The problem is…this never flinches. Because it is a choice I make, from the awareness that: No matter what happens, life goes on. So I might as well LOVE and SMILE about it.
Making yet another comparison, this time back in time, we might get yet another understanding of what happens here. When looking at Adam and Hawah, they were in a state of innocence, until they ate of the fruit. They were childlike, not having any worries. Now we see the word “Tamim” being used about Noah, and maybe he was kind of innocent also, which could explain his devotion to G-D, being a Tzaddiq. Adam and Hawah lost their innocence when they ate from the fruit of the Tree of Knowledge, and the fruit, what it was, has been discussed for generations, both by Christians and Jews (and probably also other groups). Many suggestions have been given, such as the – famous, but also unlikely, – apple, the fig (in the Talmud, since they made covers of fig-leaves, indicating that the tree was a fig tree), pomegranate, etrog, citron or grapes (according to the Zohar and commentaries to some Slavic texts).
In these moments you wear peacefulness as if it was a piece of fine jewelry.
2 hot chili peppers (the yellow ones in the jar)
- Any foreign plane crash anywhere? “Any Americans on board?”
To mark the event, Tehran staged a cartoon contest. The winner drew around the Al Aqsa mosque in Jerusalem a wall modeled on the fences of Auschwitz.
It's that time again, so get your orders in early for centre pieces and holiday arrangements! Coriander Girl will be open late the week before Christmas Tuesday the 21st through to Christmas eve until 7pm! Can I get a fist pump and an air hump!?
Asian Age Correspondent
Florida Marlins - Pop Startled
Attributes: Strenth 1 Agility 1 Mind 1 Appeal 1
Daughter L, who has been learning to play polo and is taking part in the Pony Club champs this summer. We are really fortunate in this part of the country to have a farm polo club just around the corner, which is much less expensive than some of the bigger clubs down south.
In 1996, Paul Weston died of natural causes. Stafford continued to operate Corinthian Records. In 2006, she donated her library and her husband’s to the University of Arizona.
I went back to work today. The manager was so sweet; he said, “Welcome home.” :)
Morgen: And that’s so exciting. If you could have your life over again, is there anything you’d have done differently (writing-related or otherwise)?
So what is life like for Luis and for the 200,000 other IBMers who work outside of the “office”?
The boys are still in a constant state of creating. Usually just sitting at the table drawing or making books. Right now they are all about PowerRangers. That, and figuring out Japanese symbols which has everything to do with PowerRangers. Also, the big boys are taking some classes through the Olympia School District through a program called Homeschool Connect at Olympia Regional Learning Academy (O.R.L.A.) They are in a clay class together and Bren is taking a wood shop class as well as a computer class and Wyatt is taking a "construction" class and a class all about bears. They really, really love it. It is much more work for me, but have thankfully had a lot of help, at least with taking them there. A parent (or responsible adult) has to be on the campus while they are in their classes. So that's a bit of a commitment for someone with other little kids to entertain!
I have post categories on the right hand side of the blog - you might want to check the Best Posts category, because they're, well, about the best I can do. But I've written over 3,000 posts by now, and have almost 150 in the Best Post category, so that would be a lot of reading.
When Cultural Flashpoints and Historical Accuracy Collide
The winner will be announced by the end of June 2012.
Tell your boyfriend?
The whole thing was basically brought on by a rather large man walking too closely behind me down the aisle. I turned a corner to get away from him and relieve the anxiety, but there was a woman right there, so then it was like I was sandwiched in and couldn’t escape. The anxiety ratcheted up, and I couldn’t breathe, and my chest…lawd, I felt like I was suffering from a heart attack right there in the aisle.
I am SO thankful today.
HOW EXCITING!! The players involved a diverse group of people too. Teenagers, a dad and his young kid, college girls, a couple of frat boys, older ex military guys, me (an ex soccer mom), a girl who was a foreign exchange student from germany... the list goes on. It was neat. More people kept signing up over the weekend too.
Scrapbook Heaven has done it again!! The Design Team has put together an amazing assortment of tutorials featuring flowers!! Have you ever wondered how to make the flowers you see on other peoples layouts? Join us for our 3 day on-line “FLOWER POWER” event and create flowers you will be proud to add to your next project!
This also allows you to budget for Christmas spending, so you don't completely obliterate your budget(not that I would ever do that... case in point Christmas 2010 lol) Then what you can do is add up your yearly gift-giving budget and divide this by 26. This gives you the amount you need to set aside(either cash in a special envelope or transferred to a special savings account reserved just for gift giving.) We have a separate checking account at ING Direct online bank(LOVE them!!! Not a negative thing to say about them!) and a separate debit card for that account. We have an automatic transfer that comes out of our main checking account(where the hubster's paycheck gets direct deposited) and puts the amount we have decided on into our gift-giving account every 2 weeks. That way if I am going to to my shopping online for a birthday or Christmas, I can use that debit card and not have to worry about my gift-giving money versus "regular" money/savings. Then as birthdays and holidays roll around, you are prepared and don't need to reach for that credit card! Let's get out of debt and stay out! In order to do that we need to change our thinking and plan ahead.
So the money I will be receiving from the scholarship clocks in at a ''not-too-shabby-but-not-too-glamorous-either'' €800 a month. I'm getting a room from the CROUS in a university residence - which is apparantly a privilege, since they are very hard to get. Essentially, the way it works in France is getting government-owned university accommodation is linked in with getting government grants. Around April, you fill in a hefty pile of papers, send it off, and if you're poor enough, you get:
It is a time of the year when every LEO has the chance to get together with one another, to renew old friendships and to make new ones. It is a time of year that when remembering the fallen it is okay to shed a tear or two and to know that your fellow officers feel the same way, and can come up to you and put their arm around your shoulder and say, " I'm there for you Brother and I understand what you are going through, and it's fine to let your emotions out.". It is a time of comaraderie where we all share the bond of fellowship and Brotherhood as we remember our honored dead.
4 – 7 p.m. Victory Brewing Company, Sampling in the Beer Department
The Sundarbans National Park is located on the lower areas of the river Ganges. It stretches from portions of India to territories of Bangladesh and West Bengal forming a delta region. The Sundarbans national park also known as Sundarbans and are recognized for its fresh water and humid forests. Its weather is ideal for formation and growth of mangroves. The Sundarbans are known for having the biggest and largest mangrove forests. This park offers an untamed and uncut experience and gives a life time opportunity to breath in the same air as the Royal Bangle Tigers. As per records this park has a tiger population of almost 300 and also has 30,000 spotted dears and other diverse wildlife. The best time to plan a vacation at the Sundarbans is between Septembers to mid march.
Now I have not been able to email the details yet as I can't find the receipt!!!!!! I am furious! It is in that study somewhere. I have looked where I can, but there is just so much junk in there, it will take days to find it. Anyway I won't give up. I will start on that room tomorrow afternoon and try and find that receipt. So that is my Karma. If I was organised, I would not have piles and piles of paper in many spots in that room and I would be able to find that receipt!!!!!
“There’s a four-and-a-half car advantage in the right line,” I teasingly said a block later. She remained focus.
I can do it while watching TV or listening to music. I can do it while visiting with my family. I can even do it when my brain and body are working on half speed – or less.
Recent Developments 17
understood the dark mystery of suburban existence in the TV dinner generation of post war baby boomers.
The viewing was pretty good. I’d suspect up high you’d feel a bit distant, but down in the ‘bowl’ you had a good view. The atmosphere was also great with 60,000 in there. I’ve found you get a good atmosphere when there is anything upwards of 30,000 there.
-I drove through our first real snow of the winter and headed to Georgia for one of the longest stretches of time that I've been in the state for a while.
build up to knew questions, new interests, new projects - all of which
How fun, nature adventures, especially the ones that come upon us unplanned! Thank God we have a camera when the universe unfolds like “April showers bring May flowers,” and warm Spring winds bring flying wings. Joyful adventures lie in wait for the kid in us!
Republika - (Pilsner Lager) 4.8% ABV
In that report Aylward claims that largely subjective complaints (such as ME/CFS) are often associated with psychosocial issues, not with pathology, and that “bio-psycho-social factors” may aggravate and perpetuate disability and that they may also act as obstacles to recovery and barriers to return to work. He refers to the UK Government’s “Pathways to Work” initiative, with its mandatory work-focused interviews for sick people and the use of CBT to change people’s alleged misperceptions about their health; his message is: “Barriers to recovery and return to (retention in) work are primarily personal, psychological and social rather than health-related ‘medical problems’ and that “Perceptions lie at the ‘heart’ of the problem”.
Week two of classes will include my first homework assignments due, club meetings, and sports team tryouts. Next weekend, however, is Aid Al Mawlid, the birthday of the Prophet; as such, I’ll have a four-day weekend. We are either going to travel to the desert for a camel trek, or to Marrakech and Agadir for some sun and the beach. Either will be amazing!
"In a land where magic has been forgotten but peace has reigned for centuries, a deadly unrest is simmering. Three kingdoms grapple for power--brutally transforming their subjects' lives in the process. Amidst betrayals, bargains, and battles, four young people find their fates forever intertwined:
In the end I didn't need to give up writing, I didn't need to slow down my writing. I needed to be respectful of my children's feelings. My oldest was o.k. with hearing my word count. She would grumble a little, but I knew she was happy for me. My husband was always ready to congratulate me on my latest word pile. For the younger two we talked briefly and I agreed to block one of them from seeing my word count when I posted it on facebook, and I tried to avoid talking about my word count when they were in the room. As with so many tensions, this one passed and after a couple days was no longer much of an issue for any of us. The girls got farther into their own writing and began to feel better about what they were accomplishing. I kept writing while trying to stay available.
Jenny has been a punk rock diva for as long as I've known her. She's been the lead singer and co-lyricist of at least two different punk bands that have played around the city (one of them an all-girl band), and I've seen both of them play live on multiple occasions. To be honest, Jenny will never be mistaken for Pat Benatar or Ann Wilson in terms of singing ability, but with her it's almost besides the point. She's all about putting on a stage performance. She's been known to wear a "devil" costume, complete with a plastic pitchfork, and prance around the stage, gyrating sexily while screaming her songs. Not exactly Lady Gaga, but for what it is, it's pretty funny and entertaining. And she loves it, she absolutely loves the thrill of making a spectacle of herself in the name of rock and roll.
… So what can I see from here? …Oh here goes:
Celia
In the same neighbourhood dwelt Vestein, the son of Vestein. He was a seafaring man, but he had a house under Hest, a hill in Aunundarfirth. His sister’s name was Auda. Just about this time Thorbjorn Soursop and Isgerda his wife died, and were buried in a howe in Hawkdale. Thorkel and Gisli took the homestead at Sæbol after him. A little after, Thorkel looked out for a wife. There was a man named Thorbjorn Sealnip. He dwelt at Talknafirth. His wife’s name was Thordisa, and Asgerda was their daughter. Thorkel Soursop asked Asgerda to wife, and got her; but his brother Gisli wooed Auda, the sister of Vestein, and got her. So both of them went on living under the same roof at Sæbol in Hawkdale, and did not part their goods though they were married. The story goes on to say that one spring Thorkel of Alvidra had to make a journey south to Thorsness Thing, and Gisli and Thorkel, the Soursops, went with him. At that time Thorstein Codbiter dwelt on Thorsness. He was the son of Thorolf Mosttrarskegg. Thorgrim and Bork the Stout were the sons of Thorstein, and his daughter’s name was Thordisa. When Thorkel had got through his business at the Thing, Thorstein Codbiter asked him and the Soursops to come to his house, and gave them good gifts, and ere they parted they asked Thorstein’s sons to come and see them the spring after, west at the Dyrafirth Thing. So the winter passed over, and there were no tidings. Now the next spring comes, and the sons of Thorstein fared from home–Thorgrim and Bork and fourteen men more. When they came west to the Valsere Thing they met the Soursops there, and they asked the sons of Thorstein to come home with them after the Thing, for up to that time they had been guests of Thorkel of Alvidra. So they accepted the bidding, and fared home with the Soursops. But Thordisa, the sister of those brothers, seemed fair in the eyes of Thorgrim, and he lifted up his voice and asked for her, and she was then and there betrothed to Thorgrim, and the wedding-feast took place at once, and it was settled that she should have Sæbol for her dower, the farm where these brothers had dwelt before. Then Gisli and Thorkel went to Hol and set up their abode there; but Thorgrim took up his abode there in the west, and dwelt at Sæbol. Bork, his brother, had the management in Thorsness when his father Thorstein died, and there with him dwelt his nephews Quarrelsome Stein and Thorodd.
And beautiful is that symmetry between piece strength and colour, that green is the actual colour made when mixing blue and yellow and the queen is the combined strength of a blue rook and yellow golden bishop. Also those pieces of equal strength, the knight and the bishop, are gold and red, red golden, side by side between light green and white king, dark green and black king. The middle ranks between them have all the colours of alchemy, red, gold and black as well as white, dpending on each side. There they are on the tablet with blue philosophical corner edges, 4 blue rooks (each side has the same colour except black and white pieces but one colour is a darker colour than the other, so we have in case of rook, dark blue one side a lighter blue on the other, a light green queen on one and dark green on another etc with the others- excepting the king and pawns whom are black and white depending on which side). Here is the surrealistic chessboard of love of storyland, brought back to life! Given colur in his scintlliating dance of forms, of movement. On this the artistic imagination may play, and that playing itself is the artistic process, the whole point of the art, living art, art in action, fluid and changeable like the Tao. A pleasant dance of dualities whom are not set in contrast, its just part light part dark, rather than complete light versus complete darkness and thus the dualism is changed also in this. Just to design one template set and leave it to posterity like this is a beautiful work of art when considering all its ramifications.
Dialogue is not discussion, a word that shares its root meaning with ‘percussion’ and ‘con­cussion,’ both of which involve breaking things up. Nor is it debate. These forms of conversation contain an implicit tendency to point toward a goal, to hammer out an agreement, to try to solve a problem or have one’s opinion prevail.[6]
You can understand my previous anxiety and my current relief.
11. Where do you see your store in 5 years?
When Glenda wrote to say that her Christy was moving to England,
Blending is quite easy. Apply the lighter color, then the darker color on top, then either blend in the separation of the two colors with the lighter color again, or use the middle color.
"The bright pillow on my desk chair is from World Market and I just love how bright and cheerful it is. Because of some lower back problems I like to keep a little extra support on my chair. If you spend a lot of time sitting at a desk I highly recommend purchasing a laptop stand! I love the stand I recently purchased, it was one of the best purchases I've ever made. It's made a huge difference in my posture and my back no longer hurts.
(I had the white bias tape (for the mittens) in my stash & I reused the Abby Jacket pattern that I purchased in the fall which was $4.95 & I can reuse it again)
It is only when people encounter problems they are going to look how they can solve the problems and what happened to others with the same problem. By Pixmania you shall be able to notice that a huge amount of people got problems with this ‘French’ company.
So that's about it for this weeks yarn along, time to take a peek at your lovely projects and interesting reads.
Issue #100 of Dragon (August 1985) was a milestone for the periodical, as well as for me. For the magazine, it was a portentous number to use as an occasion for celebration. For me, though I didn't know it at the time, it represented the end of an era. The same month that this was released was the last time I attended a "games day" hosted by a public library. It may have even been the last such gathering my local public libraries sponsored, since I don't ever recall hearing of others. Even if it wasn't, I remember well that my last one was a rather underwhelming affair, with far fewer participants than previous ones and most of those who did attend were much younger than I. There weren't nearly as many teenagers, let alone college students or adults, and that disappointed me.
"You cannot drink a cola or beer from a can because she wants it," owner Emma Trebilcock said. "When we have barbecues we have got to ask our friends to have their drinks from glasses because she is there waiting for the cans.
a few of the trims:
Happy Cinco de Mayo
It's hard to get an idea of the scale on the pic but those are actually quite big, 5 1/2 " in height.
Hello my dear friends, hope youre having a good day or night, it´s getting cold here, and now everything looks like Christmas will be here soon, to start decorating my house for the hollidays, I just made this Nativity, yes, this year, like canadian, well looks more like inuit, wanted to make it well dress for the cold weather, and to make it more natural look, I put it on a log, if you like it, you can make it for your house too, just print the illustrations, cut, and find a base for it, a nice box, a nice plate, or in a pot, surprise me!!
Esprit: ugh, this shop just isn't a good example of ESPRIT. Seems like it's geared toward baby-boomers and not so much toward hipsters, not much selection, crappy prices, all around "bleh" award goes to this one.
The palate was quite soft and nicely balanced between being quite sweet, quite rich and quite spicy with lovely orange-like fruit and a touch of poached pear giving more acidity and freshness than many a Gewürztraminer.
So during college this will be set up in kind of diary style.....but if you really want to follow my journal add me on livehournal (YES I KNOW ITS OLD AND NO I DONT CARE) LOL
The cake itself is light-ish, and has a very subtle coconut flavor. It's also super time sensitive. I accidentally stopped paying attention and left them in about 1 or 2 minutes too long and they came out slightly dry, so as soon as that top looks ready and the toothpick comes out clean, take those puppies OUT!
HCPC 3465 Palisade Farmstead
ACCELERATION. Miraca Gross, director of a center for gifted education research in Australia, advocates accelerating children who would benefit from more intellectual stimulation, contending that "Kids who are intellectually in advance of their years have social and emotional abilities beyond their age and they tend to gravitate towards older kids for their friendships.'' Gross also addresses the issue of support for gifted children, saying "any child should be assisted to learn to his maximum potential." Read more.
And then crash, the secondary hangover kicked in.
NOW IS YOUR CHANCE TO WIN A $25 GIFT CARD, SO YOU CAN GO ON A SOCK SHOPPING SPREE TOO!
__________________________________
Mastermind
“Would it be alright, your Majesty, if my friends could still call me ‘Joseph’?”
To do this achievement you need to have your orphan out while you eat the various food below.
You would think it wouldn't take long to tell when a relationship may be doomed. But you would surprise even yourself how long it takes. I think all of us have ignored the signs. The little ones, but also the really big ones. We all make excuses for the other person and rationalize the bad things away.
Americans want an end to the war in Iraq and Afghanistan that has cost countless human lives, suffering and TRILLIONS of our tax dollars. A war, that Alan Greenspan said, was fought for oil, period.
The bookcases have some really pretty details on the doors and on the crown molding. The right one is actually more of a “secretary” with a pull-down work surface.
For a refresher on where we have been thus far you can go here, here and here or click on the links on the sidebar to your right. It has been so long since I’ve updated that I even had to look back to see where I left off.
(Granted, when I find said awesome thing, I don’t shut up about it for a while and make sure the people around me experience it. Not that I expect them to share my enthusiasm for it, but, you know, it’s always great to have someone you can talk to about it.)
Why is the weather irritating me?
Of course, I’m talking about Atari Games’ Paperboy. The concept sounds boring, but the game succeeds due to its strong style, humor and personality. You play as a rather ugly looking boy, and your goal is to ride your bicycle across a couple of blocks, delivering papers to active subscribers, vandalizing non-subscribers, and trying to avoid getting hurt by any of the numerous deathtraps along the way. At the end of each level is a “training course” where you can rack up bonus points. The game begins on a Monday, and if you can survive through Sunday, you win the game. If you lose all your lives, you end up quitting, and if you lose all your subscribers, you get fired.
Avoiding any pain or fuss
Mara sobbed. She lowered herself to the cold, flagstone floor, pressing her hand to her mouth, overcome. She could not believe it worked. It worked!! Her heart pounded those two words over and over. It worked! It worked! In just a few days, a few short days, she would get Genesis, that fraud of a witch. She would pour Genesis’ powers into a deserving young man. With him at her side, Mara would again reign over the all-powerful night. She laughed as she pictured Dora’s surprised face when she realized she had been used. Mara knew she created a powerful enemy in Dora, but she did not care. She knew how to use the darkness in Dora’s heart, her hidden sins and desires, the skeletons clattering in her hidden spaces. Cairn would be back at her side and nothing else mattered. She brushed her hands across her eyes, took control of her emotions, and climbed back to her feet.
1 cup of cooked quinoa
So, now to come up with 7 worthy bloggers that I would like to pass this award on to:
*Dance like a Pussy Cat Doll (How? Go to youtube, type 'Buttons PCD', lock the door, put on your web stockings (optional haha), click the play button, and JUST DANCE!
so they get cold,
Without the constraining love of Jesus Christ in one’s heart what is to stop a zealous fanatic from becoming violent. The god of this world is a god of death and destruction. Paul was not at all surprised with the way fellow Jews attacked him. He had learned both from experience and in his relationship with the Lord that those who are in Christ are enemies of the world and the god of it.
-$0.25/1 Dawn Product, (Organize In Style)
As soon as she arrives, Gail clashes with Diana, the leader of the school’s most powerful clique. The Winged make Gail’s life hell until she find allies: her airhead roommate; a cowardly fellow victim of the Winged; and, bit by bit, Diana’s boyfriend–the seemingly heartless Nick.
Had a gorgeous weekend! It feels more like summer than fall here in Michigan (and how often do I ever get to say that?) We took the boys to the Oak Haven Farm, and had a wonderful time. One of the best places! Free admission and parking, and a ton of free things to do! They went through a kid sized corn maze, fed the goats, and played in piles of hay... Johnny made a "hay angel" and needless to say, they needed some serious bath time when we got home :) There was even a waterwheel and little pond with ducks :) The kiddie corn maze was their favorite. We bought some caramel apples and much needed water (all that running through mazes, you know) and took advantage of the great weather.
I am known in certain shops – all second hand bookshops I should add – as the man who comes along and picks out a selection of books that added together (perhaps five or six at a time) cost less than the price of a new book. I am lucky that I live in a town that has perhaps the best second hand bookshops in England. It is a university town (two universities!). It is a town by the sea where educated people go to retire, die and have their books distributed to the wind.
Abby looked down at the package on her lap. Carefully she unwrapped it. Inside was a silver box. With shaking hands she lifted the lid of the box and there, on purple tissue paper, sat a silver locket. It was beautiful, delicately engraved with swirling roses. She opened it and on one side of the locket was what looked like purple fabric and "I love thee" was engraved on the other side.
The funny scene (Well I found it funny)- spoilers may follow
hitting the stage and singing ballads like 'The Next Life', in which
8. Waving My Dick in the Wind 3:06
Chet Atkins – Smile
The subsequent Cataclysm - reflected in the optional rules - sees new post-apocalyptic civilisations founded by the slave races of the Ruan, the Gaal, the Askavaal and the Balee, otherwise known as the Red, Green and White Martians and Beastmen. With the Grays, these make five of the six new game factions introduced.
As I sort through the photos to create a DVD for the graduation party, I let the tears fall but have faith in the fact that God is tender towards my weakness and will provide me the needed strength. In 2012 I pray my feelings of weakness, small faith and little patience will be refined and developed into something of great worth. Lord knows I need it, because I will enter this process all over again when my second son graduates in 2014. Do you think it will be easier then? Nah, me neither. Thank God I am the daughter of a mighty King who finds great worth in small things.
One might think that with the bankruptcy of the hospital the elaborately complicated deal being careful shepherded through many city agencies, (the Landmarks Commission, the City Planning Commission, the City Council, and as herein mentioned, Community Board 2) would evanesce. To the chagrin of the community all that disappeared was the one element of the deal that was at all attractive to any of its community, the notion that in exchange for the community’s sufferance of a big new luxury real estate development it would get a hospital providing quality health care.
They also had (again, until tonight) a blog post about how all their bars were "shaman blessed," but the url (http://thunderbirdenergetica.com/thunderbird-is-shaman-blessed) now leads to an error page. I can only vaguely remember what it said--but they had some dude who came to the offices to bless the packages before they went out.
This is usually my code archive. Not everything is listed as a problem solver. Topics are specially related with the developers world. problems are not discussed as a knowledge base. so, take it easy.
1 shaft
“I don’t care. If you say is Anwar gay? I say maybe. But you cannot become prime minister. That is the reality,” said Raja Petra (picture) in an interview published today the Malay-language Mingguan Malaysia.
This is what comes of writing at 11:41 PM at night when you SHOULD BE teasing the knots out of those peskily tangled neurons and sinking into some strenuous vegetating. I feel like I’m thinking through gelatinous, rapidly condensing mud. We can only go downhill from here…
But I digress. What I wanted to say was that there was no stress at all in sitting side by side with the man who fathered my children and it was lovely to be able to both be there with no anxiety or anger so our son could enjoy his night with both of us. It was the first of many occasions where we'll need to share space for our children's best interests so it's nice to know that we can not only do it but actually enjoy the moment together. But the conversation with Sidekick and the way he behaved showed me that whilst I didn't go about it so well, I certainly made the right choice in leaving. Life's glass will always be half empty for him and I could no longer live with someone like that. It dragged me down.
Day 18: Stockpiling Tips Part 2
Wipe the drool off your chins and get over there and enter! You've still got time!
-- One in four pregnant Indian women is beaten.
After waking up from a heavy sleep, taxi driver Ahn Sung-il (Ahn Sik-kwan) wanders around the city trying to reconstruct the events of the previous evening. Bruises on his legs indicate he’s been in some sort of scuffle. When he locates his cab, his license turns out to have the picture of another driver, who has disappeared. He returns to some of the haunts of the night before: a nightclub, a movie theater, and a hotel room where he spent time with a younger looking woman. A few nice close-ups and sparing use of effectively eerie music can’t salvage this glacially paced mood piece, which is too enigmatic for its own good. (4/10)
Which is why a week ago I went, THIS HAS GOT TO STOP and concocted a half-baked plan to cheer myself up and thus thought it was high time I reread the Harry Potter series again. If there is ANYTHING in this world that could get me back into shape again it's those books. So along I go to the bookstore to buy books 5, 6, & 7 (the copies I have are so dilapidated I can't even--) and end up finding three OTHER books that make me so happy that out of nowhere--bam!--I finally feel like myself again.
1 rutabaga, chopped
Well, The Bangles might not run on Sundays, but I sure did! And oh boy did I run.
That said, I found the whole film amusing and, despite my contempt for the subject matter, the 30 seconds or so were quite moving. And that is why I feel grateful for the anonymous publicist who stepped up and showed me I was being a jerk.
I’m actually more into ebooks recently. That’s mostly because I’ve got twin toddlers, and they interrupt my reading all the time. Having a smaller amount of text displayed makes it easier for me to find my spot again. I also like that I can hold it with one hand, and if I’m reading a book for research it’s easy to highlight or make notes.
In fact, we should accept all inconveniences for the “public good” and that no one really liked having a park on their road and all crime and traffic problems were offset by the good experiences had by people from outside our community who would enjoy the park.
As would be expected with such a motley group of purveyors, this sea yarn turns out to be well-meaning but basically false. The short answer for why it’s false is that you just can’t predict the motion of the great wide ocean that easily. The short answer for why it’s sort of true is that, well, sometimes you almost can.
buying - train tickets for a trip to London
We celebrated Jerry's birthday this evening at a favorite chain Longhorn Steakhouse, and Jerry being a steak guy was quite pleased to return there. Sure wish we had such a quality restaurant and steakhouse back home in MN. We were early this evening but business was booming which indicates the economy is just not that bad in this neck of the woods. Longhorn is at the Pittsburgh Mills Mall which hosts the gamut of restaurants Smokey Bones, Olive Garden, Red Robin, and ever so many more and every single one was busy--imagine that in Tarentum, PA on a Monday night, every one is eating out. To the right is the birthday boy himself ready to enter although it sure looks as if he is questioning whether this is the place, whether this is what he wants to do, or maybe whether Longhorn is ready to provide the meal and service he expects. We did and they did and all was great, goodtime had by all.
St Job has long been revered as a worker of miracles. The Altar Crosses in the churches of the Staritsa monastery and the Tver cathedral contained particles of his holy relics.
38. Never eat fruitcake unless a hippie-drunk made it for you.
Maybe the world is coming to good.. Jai Cultural Openness!
"Both oligarch and tyrant mistrust the people, and therefore deprive them of arms." - Aristotle
Yes, act high and mighty when our enemy uses slaves, but it’s pretty hypocritical when you used the exact same slaves! And before you kick up a fuss about how they are clones and not slaves, really think it through - an army, created to serve group of masters, with no pay, and only enough food to remain optimal for use. In Episodes 4-6, the Jedi’s greatest enemy is the Empire.
They continue to suggest this spread as:
UPDATE: Gary Slider, co-owner of handgunlaw.us, reports that New Mexico has reinstated 14 of the states dropped. I appreciate his updating us on the reinstatements.
Hip Hop is another tool by those who control the world to brainwash us to believe what they have is the right way to live and if we ain’t got what they got then we are not doing it right.
Six months ago, I embarked on the current journey. I made a decision, hired a coach, put my nose to the grindstone and trained. And trained, and trained, and trained some more. It seemed like six months would never arrive. And now, it’s here. Less than 48 hours to race time and it’s all coming together.
Ok now I will go back to the couch to rest while the kids let me with a box of tissues behind me.
And we were offered free Championship tickets (Thorne CUP) for tonights game. We totally should have just gone home and packed for the marriage retreat in the morning, but it sounded like fun! So we said yes. After the parents meeting, we packed up, headed back home, dropped off Kari and kids, and Alex, then got the kids at home fed and situated, then headed back to the game at around 8pm. We were a little late, but it was fun.
First, he speaks of the “postmodern opportunity.” The same relativism and rootlessness that has weakened the church is also proving exhausting rather than liberating to many in our society. Even in the academy, postmodern theory is now widely seen as being in eclipse, and there is no “next big thing” on the horizon. Douthat wonders about the possibility of a kind of revolution from above—that is, a revival of Christianity among cultural elites.
The process is a gruesome one, not for the faint-hearted.
you’ll find one at the end of your arm.
We are a strange bunch, we humans…
Sure. I think that anyone of us at some time or another has asked God that question, because we do not always understand why certain things happen in our lives.
1/2 cup of dark chocolate chips
I dare not ask why. He will let me know — or not. He will let me grow – oh yes.
Then on to the lids. Be sure to prop these against something, or they’ll go shooting across the way, and your wing man has to run across the parking lot and get them. It doesn’t matter how we know this, just trust us.
New Year's Day I noticed - GROSS ALERT - that my urine was cloudy. I mentioned it to Grace & Jen. What did it mean? I promised them that I would call Kate and mention it.
Whether you are about to embark upon a trip to France or are just after an ‘armchair experience’ this book will be a welcome addition to your travel reading.
The Zondervan blog offers this excerpt from Craig Groeschel’s book “The Christian Atheist”, tackling a question and sentiment that everyone feels at some point.
The hold area of the giant sudcrawler is dim. Art pulls a
Today was another pretty chill day one of my teachers came pretty late but its because he just had a kid! hes a really cool guy I cant wait till next year when he moves back to ukrainian and maybe I'll serve in his home town (hes from ukraine) guess what! I now weigh 147 lbs now! I've gained 7 pounds here in the MTC I wanna gain like another 10 then I'll be set for the winter :)
That day of freedom, when faith becomes sight, swallowed up in unfading glory.
The primary differences between auto coverage and RV coverage result from the primary differences between your car and your RV. An RV is more than just an RV; it is a house on wheels. This means you need more coverage than you have on your car in order to cover potential losses that you are open to with an RV that you wouldn’t be with a car.
Well, we're sitting, and we're waiting. Got to Guiyang around noon, checked into the hotel shortly thereafter, and we'll meet our guide to go to get Maggie at 4:30. Stef wanted a Starbucks, so Graham and I went looking. In Beijing, there is a Starbucks about every 100 yards, certainly I could find one here. We walked a couple city blocks...Graham counted over 300 "stares that he saw".
So here goes; little girl born trapped in a boys body, until going to primary school little girl enjoys playing in the sun, making perfume, sitting with her mother, grows hair long, it is the sixties so no one cares, loves the sun on her face, adores her father, finds it odd that boys want to play football with her, but remains happy, goes on to primary school, enjoys sitting by the fish pond looking for myths and legends, sends a valentines card to Scottish boy with dark mop of hair, parents complain, little girl does not understand why they keep calling her an odd boy, things change, people force little girl to act in a different way, hears father saying he is embarrassed about her, the end.
There! You know 10 things about me that you didn't before. Or maybe you did; I don't know. But anyway. The six bloggers who will recieve a Kreativ Blogger Award are the new people I met via the 21 Minus blogfest -- which, by the way, is still open through Friday, March 9. Click the link for details and the contest entry form!
2. Slice zucchini and eggplant in half lengthwise, then cut into 1/2 inch thick slices. Peel and cut onion into similarly-sized chunks. Remove seeds and core from the bell peppers and chop into 1/2 inch pieces. Place all the veggies on a large sheet pan (if it seems too crowded, use 2). Add the cherry tomatoes. Break apart the head of garlic and discard any excess papery skin. Sprinkle the cloves over the vegetables.
So far, he has kept his word.
1tsp Amchur powder
Here's some of my favorite posts from the past year!
Sundays Here’s where the story ends UK
It's hard to keep track of everything.
The definition of light is very long. There is a lot to say about light. Light is the medium of illumination that makes sight possible, the condition of being visible or known, a person considered to be an authority or leader. The term “to bring to light” means to discover or reveal.
When he recounted to his wife what Sharshar had asked him to do, she sat on the floor and began to sob.
The next chore on our list is to clean up after the summer garden. We have to roll up the drip tape, and till the old plants under. It is also time to get my fall garden planted. I have been trying to hold off on planting my plants due to the heat.
Being “Money Smart” goes by many names….
my half marathon split was 1:56:08 - which was on pace for a 4:40 finish! regardless of the math, that wasn't a realistic target. i expected to finish much closer to 5 hours (and was surprised at how close to 5 hours it actually took). my next 5 mile split, at 46:06, had crept over a 9 minute pace. my 15 mile split was 2:13:11, still under a 9 minute overall pace. but the next 5 miles, at 48:13:09, which got me to 20 miles in just over 3 hours (3:01:24), slowed the overall pace to 9+ minutes.
Dear Betty Crocker.... Um If you wanna serve food in a school, you may want to reconsider these ingredients. This is every single allergy in our building rolled into an oatmeal bar.
But they cannot sell more than 4 vehicles per month??
Yes, it’s lost within
Louis Leterrier.
Maybe I expect too much, having travelled through the Konkan more times than I care to remember where rivers and rivulets snake as densely as the lines in the palm of the hand, where the green is spread around as widely as the blue overhead.
The Sandcastle estate, set on 11.5 acres, features 31,000 sq. ft. of living space on three floors, which include 12 bedrooms, 12 baths, and recreational amenities such as a pool, tennis court, skateboard half pipe, rock climbing wall, squash and racket ball court, two-lane bowling alley, full bar and disco, and a spa. It was originally built by Joe Farrell, founder of Farrell Building Co. in Bridgehampton, as his own residence, reports newsday.com, and has been rented for $500,000 per two-week stay. The asking price has been reduced from $59.5 million.
Straight from the mouth of God to His People, “who has given me anything that I need to give back”? Everything under heaven belongs to God. Therefore He has the right to grant you the freedom of choice which God does. There is nothing in service to the Lord that requires the Lord to bless you. His Promises are a gift. You cannot earn them only make room for them in your life. When we give to God or to others in obedience to Him, we make room for the Lord to bless us and activate the cycle of sowing and reaping in our life. However, as in life, we try to work the system getting something for nothing. God does not need anything from you. However, that does not exempt you from your end of salvation. Obedience cultivated in love and appreciation for the Lord will promote giving in our life. But we must empty our life of the idols standing in the way. Many people draw a line between God and their finances and natural means. They will use verses such as this twisting them for their own purpose to some way validate their lack of faith in God and excuse profound disobedience. Make no mistake God wants all of you beginning with your heart.
We are away this week on a little family vacation but I couldn't resist a quick post about La Droguerie. Somehow or other I found this post about a lovely top someone made and published on her blog with a La Droguerie pattern called 'En sortant de l'ecole' and I MUST HAVE this pattern but looking at their website I can only see knitting patterns and no sewing patterns :(
It's as close as playing in the living room, but better.
With Luke, Clyde and Rani trapped in a bizarre dreamscape, Sarah Jane must fight alone. As the Nightmare Man grows stronger, only K-9 might hold the key. But can Luke summon the courage to face his adult life before the whole world is trapped in an endless nightmare?
sickle-clouds
Edited include full links:
Because of the above, I am not addressing the issue of rape or the sexual harassment, but what I would like to address are the comments and whistles down the street. I am not saying that men have the right to say anything they want but at times inappropriate dressing can cause inappropriate looks from both men and women. For example I have seen women, with outfits so short it leaves nothing to the imagination and some who have no clue that there is a difference between footless tights and leggings, which they decide to wear with a tiny see through top that does not even begin to cover the bottom half and they walk around with all their ’unmentionables’ on display and I think to myself… ‘really’… if this is what I think, am sure there are guys who feel like they are getting a free show. In most cases men will throw a comment based on the whole package, the dressing and looks.
From Here to Eternity (1953)
Is history in danger of repeating itself over lighter, paler beers?
Once it becomes apparent that you have blown it, there will be no changing your mind, no altering your plan, no rescinding of your Last Will and Testicle. It is done. You just made the world a worse place to live for several cuddly endangered species. Happy with yourself loser? We all should hope not. But we'd love to hear what The Authorities will says about your $10,000 donation to the Get Some Anthrax* And Put It In Richard Dawkins Tea Society... (Um... they'd probably facilitate it!)
So how crafty are you?
By what hung out on that line !
as they touch passers-by beneath
I can already hear some of you "but I'm not web savvy, I can barely do email". Don't worry, it isn't rocket science, if you can read you can do it AND do it yourself. You won't need no stinking PR firm.
Anyway, it said at the beginning that some bits of dialogue had been made up and I was dying to know which. The one in my title? Or "Childhood is a magical time" "My father was twice the man you'll ever be!' (to her first husband), "Last year I made more money than the Chancellor of the Exchequer" "Hugh is having a fandango with a floozy" (I do hope she said that!) "New beginnings are always marvellous!"
How this was going through my mind over and over today...
I’m not against standardized tests; as a general rule, I’m a huge fan. I appreciate the accountability, and the focus and drive that it can provide to administrators. There are basic things that I think students should know and be able to do in each of their subjects, and the CSTs (and like tests) make a good stab at them. They’re not perfect, but they’re okay. And, as my master teacher told me, meeting the standards should be the easy part. It’s the passing on a life-long love of reading and learning that’s difficult.
Our brilliant transportation minister Salam al-Maliki who is a Sadrist by the way announced that his ministry will suspend all projects and contracts with Denmark and Norway and said that Iraq will stop accepting any donations or offers concerning Iraq's reconstruction!
Check your retweets now and then too--if people RT you automatically by just clicking the “Retweet” button under your tweet, you may not see that in your replies. It’s good to thank people who’ve shared one of your tweets, and checking your RTs will show you who’s done that. Click the “Retweets” tab, then “Your tweets, retweeted.
I finished “Cassandra” just five minutes ago.
CPT had a lot of people there that he knew to visit with. There were a few ladies that I knew that I visited with. One was Mrs. Daniels. I enjoyed her. I stayed with her most of the time. Soon, it was time for lunch. Potato casserole and corn and steak and hot dogs and rolls and all sorts of WONDERFUL stuff! It turned out to be a lot of fun for "Mandatory Fun". hehe.
The other problem, of course, is that Ms Patroski has now revealed to the world that she has no control over her climaxes. Although this is not the worst condition in the world, perhaps being the opposite of frigidity, it does make her a tempting target for fiends and perverts. Speaking as a former circus ape, I can assure you that the dwarves I knew would have been creaming their tights at the thought of getting into a confined space with Ms Patroski. Although small in stature, they preferred normal-sized women and had fingers that could poke holes in a watermelon.
Will he come after her? Will he drag her back to London, quelling her mission to rescue her treasure-seeking parents, or might he decide to throw caution to the wind and choose Foy Pour Devoir: “Faith for Duty,” the St. Easton motto. The Featherstone motto Valens et Volens: “Willing and Able,” beats in her heart and thrums through her veins. She will find her parents and find their love, no matter the cost.
I shall not elaborate much on the food since I didnt try them all (only took small bites), but overall they were tasty and nicely flavoured. I will definitely return another day to try more of their stuff with Hubby.
At one meeting his mom arrived to pick up her daughter and I introduced myself. I let her know that I had gone to high school with her son and that my daughter really enjoyed being in the same troop with her daughter.
3) Aortic Valve Sclerosis - This is the "gunk" that accumulates on heart valves and then calcifies like leftover meatloaf in the back of our refrigerator. It could cause his two valves (the big fused one and the little one) to work a little harder than necessary.
In a pan,add oil with mustard seeds.
To define force—it is that x that turns anybody who is subjected to it into a thing. Exercised to the limit, it turns man into a thing in the most literal sense: it makes a corpse out of him. Somebody was here, and the next minute there is nobody here at all; this is a spectacle the Iliad never wearies of showing us:
I realized then, that while running is good for your body, the sun, cold, wind, and harsh weather aren’t good for your face and head. This got me thinking. Did you ever notice that our butts, which are always covered with clothes are smooth, unwrinkled, and still like a baby’s bottom even when we’re in our eighties and nineties. That thought lead me to develop what I call “Face Pants.” They’re a combination of a hat and a pair of pants. I even kept the zipper so you can see where you’re going. Go ahead and laugh, but when I’m Forbes Magazines man of the year, and my face looks like a toddlers, you won’t be laughing.
The same logic applies to plenty of other binaries in circulation these days. Think of the number of times you’ve heard people insist that doing without some specific technology we use these days is equivalent to doing without all technology, and going back to living in caves. Think of the broader discourse from which this derives, in which any alternative to continued progress along the lines that (supposed) progress is (allegedly) progressing is equated to catastrophe. Think of the people who insist that their political movement, or religious movement, or activist movement or, really, any kind of movement you care to imagine—barring the one obvious and scatological exception—is the only alternative to whatever the horrible future du jour happens to be.
“I know what I saw.”
At 540 nautical miles (1,000 kilometers ) long and lying at a maximum depth of 2,000 meters, the cable would be the longest in the world.
Shakespearean scholar Harold Goddard once said, “The destiny of the world depends less on the battles that are fought and won than on the stories the world loves and believes in.” This is important to keep in mind this resurrection morning, because the story we choose to love and believe in determines not only when we celebrate but also what we celebrate in this holy season.
This baby has the power to heal even the driest skin! I'm contemplating using it on my face around my eyes...you know, for the wrinkles that are creeping in? Hmmmm...what do you think?
Perhaps oppression is in the eye of the beholder?
Awready!: The Houston Hip Hop Conference to be Held March 27 & 28, 2012
If "The U" didn't pay Shannon what he was owed they should pay the man what was coming to him. They already fired him, so just pay him his money.
And when two people have loved each other
What about put it in those foam pink rollers overnight?
Backing up a bit-- we started out with miso soup, edamame, and a panko crusted mashed potato fritter thingy. All of that was quite nice, too. Miso and edamame are pretty simple dishes and pretty hard to screw up, true. But done just right they can be sublime. The scent of miso is definitely one of my big madeline experiences, and slurping away at Kome's miso, instantly transported me back to my visits to Kamakura, Japan, one of my favorite places in the world, a place I feel so oddly at home it makes me wonder about this whole past life thing and if, in fact, I was Japanese at some point (as, some say, my very first baby picture seems to suggest).
Ian saw the hurt in me, he was sweet, he said he'd take care of me. But he had business to do in that town and I worked in different towns each week driving in a beat up car to strip in this bar one week and then another next week all over Alberta and Northern B.C.
As it happens, we didn’t buy the wetsuits (yet anyway!) but it clearly illustrates how twitter alone converted a sale and also may have resulted in some cross-selling.
any river, streams or pond, and wander where they chose, without the fear
Alex, Niall’s daughter, is involved in a terrible school mishap when her fey powers go out of control. Thinking her dead, Niall grieves; yet, through an unexpected communication through a bathroom mirror he learns that Alex is still alive.
Rosario Dawson is appalling – with exaggerated head bobbing (just pose dagnamit) and over-acting to burn.
And to think I was frustrated over having to pay under 20$ for a mistake I made, then fixed.. tried to explain.. but not even given the opportunity to show where it was fixed. Although everyone else knew and understood, 1 person was able to say "no, you are wrong. Give me the money." Regardless of facts.
CIA report predicting that Israel won’t survive, 1947 Republicans give Obama a new campaign slogan Brilliant: Google street view exposes top secret IDF base FDR used the Jews, and the Jews tried to enlist the Republicans for their cause Former Palestinian Communications Ministers Slams Attorney General Over Web Censorship Biotechnology milestone as Israeli drug gains FDA approval Overnight music video Video: Latma–Yuval Diskin Consults and Freddie Spin Plans the Elections IDF denies it held a secret chemical drill Rabin assassin’s brother released from prison 4-May-12: Fewer terror attacks? It’s no accident Who shall live and who shall die? Beinart vs Gordis Deathmatch 4-May-12: The bloodbath that is Syria: can anyone make any sense of it? LATMA’s tribal update featuring Yuval Diskin consulting and Freddie Spin planning the elections Guess The Lover In Honor Of Star Wars Day This is not a parody: Muslim joining ADL Board of Directors Surprise: Most Israelis want elections in November 2013 just like they were supposed to be Moran Samuel On The ‘Italian Job’ Hamas cynically celebrates World Press Freedom Day Antisemitic Belgian Waffle
I asked him, more like yelled, “So, after all of these, is it worth doing them?? Did things happen how you wanted them to be? Don’t you think she would have quit her job if you didn’t do all these things?? What in the hell were you thinking? What could she have possibly done if you didn’t appease her like this?” I was crying and yelling, I was so angry. All he could muster to say was that he really regretted everything that he had done last year; from the Affair itself to everything that I’ve mentioned above. He said if he only knew that she would still be at work and that it would cause so much hurt to me yet again, he wouldn’t have done them. Well, hindsight surely is 20/20.
He starts off by railing against NJ governor Chris Christie’s waistline, then blasts the billionaire Koch brothers for being too charitable to a cause that King doesn’t care for, and then closes his piece by comparing the fate of rich people to that of Marie Antoinette.
Talking of music, last time an artist bared his torso on an album cover was D’Angelo with his sophomore record “Voodoo” as far back as 2000. Bearing in mind the turn his music career took thereafter, let’s hope it's not the same fate that awaits Cuban pianist virtuoso Roberto Fonseca because he’s just produced the most mature record of his short, but prolific musical career.
A choir including singers from parishes throughout the Bulgarian Diocese and guests from other OCA parishes sang the liturgical responses.
decay that have bedeviled the
I wonder if this floor will ever not be sticky again! It is syrup, after all!
(iv) God’s creation should not be given any of His attributes
Helping Me Cut Paper
So, I’m following up from my post about finding that perfect home and my frustrations. Well those frustrations came to a halt with some new mobile technology that I was unaware of and some technology that has been updated to benefit that “home seeker” weather buying or renting.
And here I am, this morning feeling perkier than a new born lamb. I might actually gambol.
Where will the Lord lead his children? Closer and Closer to him and that may be a peaceful stream, or through the Rea Sea, or through a storm.
( Anyone know where I can get a copy of that? )
Somethings Wrong Somewhere
I love holidays.
I'll be back...
The character development in this one was wonderful, with Meghan now having to deal with who she is, and the romance between Ash and Meghan taking a more central role. In fact, a whole lot of the focus in this book is on the love triangle between Puck, Meghan and Ash. I don't have anything as such against love triangles, really--they can be so incredibly exciting when they're executed well. However, this one falls in the trap of being a kind of a Twilight-esque love triangle, with one dude obviously having the upper hand over the other.
1 Cucumber, seeded and peeled (if not organic, if it is organic simply wash. The skin’s actually quite good) and cut into bites
a fifth, white candle in the center.
Please ensure your email has SSDT in the subject line
A: Because I like to learn new stories and they help me go to sleep.”
* Sometimes labeled “ground almonds”; available at specialty foods stores and natural foods stores.
Priest-King
But something tells me that you wouldn't make it past four or five nights on the Island, which would be good for the Corps.
I love the feel of the lotion and the fact that there is no over powering scent. The scent is light. My husband even uses the cream and takes a travel size tube with him to work and when he goes away for business trips. The healing cream is more concentrated and works GREAT on my cracked and dried out knuckles, it really penetrates and helps aid in healing.
When we go to our couples therapy we have to wait a few minutes out front because it is after hours and the therapist has to come down to let us in. Across the street there is a church with purple doors.
Anyway, what a week. However it is when all the hype calms down that the work really begins and this is where I had to make some seriously tough decisions.
I love thee purely, as they turn from praise.
This post is dedicated to my beloved Grandma Dorothy who turned 92 yesterday.
Once the plunge attachment was fixed to the wood it was just a case of fitting it back on the router and then fitting a sanding drum, I got a set with 5 different sized sanding drums, at the moment I'm using the largest, but as there are different sizes I have a fair bit of choice as to what I can do with the sander / router in terms of shaping wood.
Before I go - for my work here is almost done - I wanted to resurrect a few more Remnants from the past.
Caught up to them a little before midnight, made pretty good time I guess. Still ten miles to go before we reach Texas. I think that’s them. Haven’t seen any other buses the whole time. Yeah, bus number 1333, that’s it.
fitness for purpose fashioned it.
After shooting them I ran. Fortunately, I was faster than the zombies, but there was so many of them all around me, closing in...slowly...but surely.
To my great surprise she answered Angers (because she thought I would never know the village she is living)
As you can see, we had the beach to ourselves. It was a beautiful day, and I wish we could have stayed longer. The beach here is wide and clean. We were at the Lori Wilson Beach Park, which has free parking, bathrooms,showers, a playground, and easy beach access. There are hotels nearby, but they are far enough away that you don’t feel crowded by them.
Anyway, I spent most of my weekends in London, which is like New York only cleaner and more charming and with more seating. On one particular weekend, however, I spent a day in Ashdown Forrest. You probably know this particular forest by a different name, The Hundred Acre Wood. The original plan was to go with a group of friends and we were going to play Pooh Sticks at Pooh Stick Bridge and have tea at Piglet’s Garden. But when it came down to it, they had other priorities and so, I made the journey alone.
I would be classified as a WAHSAH mom – Work At Home, Stay At Home mom. Except that instead of doing the work part on a part-time basis while the kids are at school or something like that, I do it generally about 8 hours a day. It might start at 5:30 in the morning when I’m pulling follow-up sheets for our staff, and be intermingled with dinner, then checking and responding to emails, hanging the clothes on the line, working on a project, blogging, getting dinner ready… You get the idea. Since my “office” is my living room it can be hard to carve out specific work time and specific home time. And heck, I have a 9 month old! Chris has been a little less busy on the work front in the last few months because he’s delegated a lot of stuff to our workers, so he’s been doing a lot of childcare lately while I do a lot of mission work. I feel pulled between things right now because I feel like my kids have seen my back as I sit at my computer more than they’ve seen my face, but I know that it’s a season and as I keep hacking through the projects on my proverbial plate I know that in a couple weeks there will be less and I can start shifting gears a bit. And I’m looking forward to that.
My husband really liked this dish. It is simple and good. He loves stir fry so I am always trying new recipes out on him. Let me just tell you that when we were dating I made a simple stir fry with sesame oil. I had never used sesame oil. I thought it was like olive oil. I was sooo wrong. We had to throw it out and go out to eat! I have improved since then and am not as generous with the sesame oil.
Jason Andrews is used to having women fall at his feet. When Taylor Donovan gives him the cold shoulder, he's thrown for a loop. She's unlike any other woman he's ever met: uninterested in the limelight, seemingly immune to his advances, and shockingly capable of saying no to him. She's the perfect challenge. And the more she rejects him, the
Stewed Chickpeas
But New York is so much more than Manhattan. Take a walk down the West Side to Battery Park and hop aboard the Staten Island Ferry, doesn’t cost a dime.
Hence this attempt to create multi-platform language!
The new orders came as Pakistan and U.S. officials continued to trade conflicting accounts of what happened in the incident, which American officials say came after a joint U.S.-Afghan unit took fire from the Pakistani side of the border but which Pakistani officials say was unprovoked. No American or Afghan casualties were reported in the incident, which now is thought to have occurred shortly after midnight Nov. 26.
Yesterday my new blog books came in the mail!
“Beauty of things loves hidding itself”
I let go of the anger that he lied and hurt me.
But Rosen, herself a working mother, did not back down. “I am raising children too. But most young American women HAVE to BOTH earn a living AND raise children. You know that don’t u?” she tweeted at Ann Romney.
A great deal of this stimulation is supported and amplified by advertising. Everywhere we turn, there is advertising. You can't swing a dead account planner without hitting some. In addition to flooding all our traditional channels of communication, advertising has now saturated all our new media.
Paul writes about his personal
1 tsp Soya sauce
Coffee with soy milk
I used a border punch for the stitches on the red cardstock and inked the edges of the polka dot paper and white layer to age it a little. I had cut the cherries out a while ago while playing around with my Gypsy so those were ready to go. A little twine, ribbon and rhinestones and BAM done. You know I really miss the Emeril show!
how do you decide to have 6 kids
Giveaway Time
Girls have to have dowries, so a family has to work hard for it for years. The pension system in China is meant for a narrow circle of state clerks. Elderly Chinese parents are supported by their sons. Hideous crimes committed against little helpless kids happen all across China, not just in remote rural areas. Beijing garbagemen often find dead bodies of little children in stinky wastes. Sometimes they are still alive...
My next Christmas Card Stamp A Stack is scheduled for Wednesday June 6th. Class is limited to 8 persons, but I will run a repeat class (Friday 8th June) if needed. Please contact me via my Demonstrator Business Website if you would like to join the class.
The current shining star in Scottish football, Forrest appears to be destined to play at a high level throughout his career. He has inevitably been likened to Aiden McGeady by pundits but has a better goal to game ratio than McGeady did at this time and perhaps more importantly appears to be able to adapt to the goldfish bowl surroundings in Glasgow that McGeady could never. Forrest already has four Scotland caps to his name and has been linked with a high profile transfer to Tottenham. What has been clear this season is that when Celtic were poor in October and November, it was Forrest who was frequently their best player and spurred on his team mates. Forrest appears to have a brilliant career ahead of him proven by being the only Scottish inclusion in the recently compiled list of the World’s 100 Best Young Players for 2012.
* The worst pun I have ever heard...
People fear the emotional being so much, and repress it, and because our parents in their thankless task of civilising us as they themselves were civilised, feared and repressed it. Repressed, it gains the energy of the repression, and becomes the Id monster, because it claims freedom. That hurts. Possibly, when I suppress my emotional being I stop it maturing properly, so it really needs to undergo stages of development which ideally it would pass through before physical maturity. And I think the work I am doing in my ritual space, loving and caring for the baby Clare, is necessary work, gentling and reassuring my emotional being like a frightened horse or dog, so that she may take her rightful place beside my intellect, working together, each doing the work appropriate to herself and not intruding on the other’s realm.
Some of the guys also expressed frustration with their public defenders. Some complained of lack of communication, annoyance with being asked to take a plea, and others thought that their attorneys were working against them hand-in-hand with the prosecutors on the opposing side. We tried to assure them that many public defenders are well-meaning but are burdened with huge caseloads of 100+, limited time to really talk extensively with their clients before seeing the judge, and the smaller salaries as a result of the lack of funding public defender offices receive from the government. But then I thought to myself, how much does that really matter to someone who is incarcerated or to someone when they’re about to see a judge? How does that help their present situation? Should they really care? These thoughts came to mind because while I felt it was necessary for them to know a bit about being a PD, I didn’t want to come across as trying to convince them that they must feel sympathetic and just accept it…for lack of a better way to put it.
I feel like I have missed so much of her life, but I am reminded that I have the rest of her life.
So it's been such a busy year, I can't even begin to go into everything going on around here, but I will try and start catching up.
Here's the post! I blurred out her name, because I'm nice like that :) I liked it.
Bake at 200ºC for 10 minutes.
"Thanks to the mother of Christopher Nolan for going through the pain of birthing him."
Following a break, party Chairman Robin Tilbrook addressed the gathering. Robin explained a bit about his own background and talked about the formation of the English Democrats in 2002.
glittered embossing powder: American Crafts
The Chinese also stopped buying US treasuries for a while to put pressure on this group.
This skirt is my ode to Sydney. Sydney is huge, brash, outspoken and good-looking (hopefully so is this skirt!) and so are its people. It can also be lonely, rude and expensive, congested and HOT!
I did try to point out that perhaps the boys were not in the right frame of mind as they had just been watching snippets of "Come Fly With Me" on YouTube.
And lest we think zombie was Polis’s only euphemism here, let’s remember that earmark already refers to pigs (or other herd animals). The machine were are all hooked to is a political beef-jerkery in which, of course the earmarks are zombies, recycled year after year, for voters who are also kinds of zombies, working, being taxed and paying for the earmarked economy, they are zombies, churning away in the Haitian sugar-mills, building highways to nowhere. All of law is just a bunch of Congressional earmarks packaged together. Earmarks is how you keep the pigs counted before you grind them to sausage. Which is how you make law in a corrupt democracy of apathetic unaware zombie citizens, right before they grind them to sausage too.
Now, a traditional Victorian Menu for a dinner party in February of 1876 would be anything for 7 to 14 courses, with multiple options. Here, for example, is one . . .
Horse racing remains a major sport in the UK with billions being spent in bets, and prize money in excess of £100 million per year. It remains one of the last national sports with weekly live terrestrial TV coverage.
What attracted you to children's literature? Do you see yourself writing for adults, or editing adult fiction, in the future?
I hope you all had a gorgeous Christmas with your loved ones and received many brilliant book shaped packages and other pressies.
You can’t really steer a hot air balloon. Altitude is controlled through the propane burner below the balloon opening. Since hot air rises, when the air inside the balloon is heated, the balloon goes up. Any sideways traveling depends on air currents.
The kids, recognizing that this would be a neat photo brought great spirits to the project – although to be perfectly honest, my kids bring good spirits to all of our projects. By now they are used to “mom’s crazy ideas” and they good naturedly go along knowing that at the very least, it will always be an adventure.
Ryan Bingham:"Hallelujah"
Is it not true that the real “change” we need is the means of reversing all the ill thought through and many truly malevolent “changes” which have been forced upon us in recent decades.
Maternity Clothes: Dresses are most comfy these days but it's hard to find ones that aren't to short because of the belly. Maternity dresses can only be found in small sections at Macy's and Target.
First off, I absolutely adore the display from the collection. The swirly design is rather different and chic. I was also pretty excited to see the colors in person. First up are the glossimers ($29.50USD). Right off the bat I can tell 3 of the 6 shades are on the lighter, paler side. There are also 3 shades with shimmer and 3 without.
According to the press release, the above sweeping lines are a point d’ironie, a humorous punctuation mark created by 19th century poet Alcanter de Brahm. The lines are shown against a deep black lacquered barrel with complementary blue roundels. The cap and trim offset the black of the barrel with their bright chrome plating.
When little children everywhere, can sing because they are free.
I want a drink, not a ‘natter’.
I know my kids don't want to cause harm to other people. They don't want to hurt feelings, or bodies, or damage property. They don't want to be rude or disrespectful. I trust that someday they will be able to understand enough to keep from doing these on their own, most of the time, just like I trusted they would learn to walk. But I know that even as adults who know better, people sometimes hurt each other. Even adults who are experienced walkers fall down.
To do this Nintendo is focusing on getting core games to market. Rumors of GTA5, CoD:BO2, a Nintendo FPS, racing sim, return of EternalDarkness and the consoles abilities to play MMO’s shows Nintendo wants its old core fans back.
Process all veggies in food processor, until chopped. Most veggies can be shredded in your food processor. Shred cabbage first, add back to meat and simmer until well cooked (while you process the rest of the veggies). Add water as needed. Add some salt, though it should be very underseasoned by human standards. After cabbage is cooked, add the rest of the veggies and bring to a boil. Simmer with veggies for 5-10 minutes.
There's a lot to occupy your mind on Two for the Pot's shelves. But nothing so amuses me as an antique scale that the owner keeps in a cubby hole on the right side of the store. It's a curio, but also a working appliance. As a sign behind it alerts us, it is inspected every year by whatever city or state official inspect such things, and is therefore accepted as a legal manner to conduct mercantile transactions in the way of weighed teas, coffees and spices.
Fareda: Just what? Just materialistic? Just conceited? Or just self-centered? Pick one Anwaar for any of these things fit her perfectly. She does not care about anything as long as she has her luxuries. She won’t even care if the whole world died because of it. That’s why some of us, women, can be easily deluded by men. Some of us are too concerned about our selfish desires that we become oblivious to the reality of injustice.
2:00 pm. Deconstructing socks with Clara Parks. This lady is like a walking, talking encyclopedia of yarn knowledge. And we’re grilling her. I’m learning so much more about fiber than I ever thought there was to know. For instance:
Recently on an Arizona run to visit family, I had the privilege in attending my sister’s Church in Peoria, AZ. The Church is huge with many buildings for many Christian based activities. As you walk up to the Church, there are rows of trees and a grassy area where families are encouraged to stay and play with even a BBQ provided.
The Business Journal 018
Meg's Garden
I admit, I read the Twilight books with joy at one point. The first book came out when I was still in middle school, and my pubescent-self loved it. I started to have doubts once I got to the second book, and the third book didn’t help any. By the time the fourth emerged, I really could not be surprised by the ridiculous disappointments anymore.
Be encouraged today,
3. Maybe I’m Amazed…Taking time to notice something every day that makes me think..wow.
I really yearn to like New Belgium's beers. The labels are pretty, the styles are interesting, the company is philanthropic and green, and they have a Belgian brewer. Alas, that makes them a lot like Starbucks*--cool company, poor brew. I've worked my way through most of their beers in the past few years, and I'm always disappointed. They are underwhelming echoes of the classic styles they were inspired by.
True supporters of Aishwarya are urging the media to back off as “She’s enjoying her life and her new baby, and doesn’t give a damn about what the rest of us think of her or her body. And that’s good reason for all women – pregnant or not – to celebrate.”
You know what changed? I bought a kitchen scale. (I’m not kidding. It was the scale that did it. My eight previous attempts were utter failures, and then I bought a kitchen scale and came out with perfectly smooth, footed macaroons.)
05 Moving in Stereo
Increasingly, though, more and more security guards in these lobbies are yelling at me to un-plug my phone, and telling me it’s “rude”, I “should ask permission”, and that it is simply “common courtesy” not use these outlets. The most amusing was today when, after my phone had been plugged in for twenty minutes with no problem, the front desk security “guard” told me (quite forcefully and impassionedly) that I had to unplug because it would “set off their alarms”. That doesn’t even make sense.
In 2007, a newspaper reported on how identified al-Qaeda supporters had been employed by the police. “Eight Al Qaeda fanatics working for the police (but they don’t dare sack them),” read the headline.
Thankfully for you uncle Mo is on vacation in the Seychelles at the moment and can’t opine on this opprobrious image. Hmm, kinda eerily similar to THIS!!!
LOTS of women never even had the option for an epidural.
This is a great book to read and I am so excited to know about what will happen next. I recommend this book to those who like books that are sort of romantic and dangerous. I especially like these kinds of books because when you say that you aren’t going to read, you are caught by yourself reading the next chapter, and the next and the next. I would rate this book a 5/5.
R6-7- ch1, sc in each sc.
(I'm told my last words to him made it into the 6:00 a.m. Channel Four News but I can't find a clip to prove it.)
Said-tags and adverbs are commonly linked together. Take this sentence for example:
like a lamb that is led to the slaughter,
We'd go dancing. To coffee. She was invited into my home for a dinner party once and painted the thankga for the Tibetan Wheel of Life on my graveyard jacket, something I'd wear with pride. For a couple of years, we were pretty tight.
This is not the first time that Tanstaafl has assured us that he does not want to exterminate Jews. I’d say that’s putting the bar rather low. Tanstaafl, what measures WOULD you consider regarding Jews? You have written that “not all Jews are our enemies”. Could you please indicate what you see as the identifiers of a non-enemy Jew, and what place such a person might properly occupy in white society? You have also mentioned “questioning the Holocaust”. Could you identify to what extent you question it? (e.g., four million vs. six million, or something more fundamental?). Since you have called on Larry Auster to be more frank, it seems only fair to ask the same of you.
So to the title of this post, it's a quote from Katharine Hepburn, 'If you obey all the rules, you miss all the fun'. That kind of sums it up for me, I haven't followed the rules, this isn't what people expected me to do, but I'm excited for the future, it's fun not knowing what is coming next. I feel like a cloud has lifted & after a stress induced baking hiatus, Ive even made some cookies!
The exchange itself can be seen below:
V/A - Shreds (Shredder Records 1988. Comp with Crimpshrine, gail & the fudgepackers, bo, special forces. 1000 pressed on clear red)
Not everyone will be online – Gramma is probably more likely to want you to call and other people are too busy to post often.
Following a comment on Youtube claiming - with valid arguments - that the video I posted might not be what I stated it was, I have been tracing the friend who copied the video for me (years & years go). Contributing to my doubts regarding the origins of the groupe in the video was my discovery, on one of my VHS-tapes, of two tracks by "Les artistes de San".
thursday, 30aug update:
The 9 Funniest Sitcoms Aired This Week:
said the unifaun to his true love's eyes.
The birthing tub will feel like moms amniotic sac and will assure security for baby.
1-6x6 Life In The Country Paper Pad Double Sided
Now, for those that read this blog I'd like to add a disclaimer that when food is made out of love, bought out of love, brought out of love...it takes on a special healing quality. It changes. All of the qualities that I normally would have disdain for...factory farmed meat, genetically modified ingredients, high fructose corn syrup...disappear out of gratitude for the love in the food.
What comfort this sweet sentence gives!
The most accomplished and attentive players on Nate's soccer team are homeschoolers; this brought me in contact with a couple of moms who illustrated "what it's like" and cracked me open to the notion--perhaps proximity breeds curiosity and motivation.
But there are lessons to be learned from even the worst teacher-student relationships, as I’m sure many of you can attest.
The investigation began early last March, when an exporter of agricultural products from the Murcia region received a warning from their overseas customers about finding shipments of lettuces with fragments of broken glass inside, having noticed this fact just before distributing the lettuces to the final consumers.
You were the most content newborn, who turned into THE happiest baby, the funnest most active toddler, and the most confident loving little boy. You are not so little anymore, in fact you are growing and maturing right before my eyes. You have turned into an amazing boy. You love with everything you are. You do not hesitate to meet any need that you see.
"Now then, Wesley." he says, as Wes goes into the other room, "We just need a sample from you. You know what that means? Nudge. Nudge"
"Dani's story may seem like another troubled foster kid at first, but the deeper you read into her life the more you see how unique and special she is. This is an engaging story of a young woman who has witnessed terrible things and experienced heartbreak and pain no one should ever have to face, but her strength gives her a chance to make her life into something more than another link in the chain of addiction and abuse. Along with all of that, Songbird weaves a beautiful tale of love and romance. But like the rest of Dani's life, love won't come easily for her. The struggle she goes through to find out who she is and who she belongs with kept me reading just as much as the mystery. There was sadness in Songbird, but it was tempered by hope and love. Songbird was a fantastic read with so much depth that it stayed with me long after i finished the last chapter."
- Copy and paste the castle, sun and cloud over your paper layer and arrange them
great the warfare of darkness and Light.
Acts 9:4-5
Shihoco.
2. If you had to leave your home with your food storage, it would be much harder to move thousands of little cans, than fewer larger ones.
“I didn’t fight when some kids were picking on me,” she said. “I just started tapping and walked away.”
I stamped the image onto some confetti white card stock with black stazon and colored using my aqua painter and ink pads. I used Island Indigo for the truck.
“Cleanse them. Cleanse the world of their ignorance and sin. Bathe them in the crimson of …Am I on speakerphone?”
-Goose
she is quilting on black satin: golden stars, a silver moon.
VG: Tell me about Fibonacci sonnets.
Local officials in the worst-affected towns of Teresopolis and Nova Friburgo said the number of missing was at least 300. Many of them are believed buried under the avalanches of mud and debris from flash floods that destroyed hundreds of homes.
While voters were attracted to the celebrity of Boris for Mayor (despite being reminded that they were not voting for a game show host), elsewhere Labour made gains, in London and in Council elections which were held. Much more to add, but that's it for now, look forward to other local analysis - we're off out!
We men – play with spiders and other creepy crawlies.
“I think it’s time to put this to rest,” said Debbie Huggins, who fought back tears as she and her sister, Cathy Durham, remembered their father and asked board members to deny Selsor’s request for clemency.
In our previous post, Creating Social Media Community, we finished talking about creating our Social Media 4 C’s, Content, Context, Connection, and Community. In this post we explore what you can do with your community.
apr..grasmere fells and tarns and gingerbread 21m with charlie
GINGRICH: You know, I have proposed an alternative flat tax that people could fill out where you could either keep the current system — this is what they do in Hong Kong — keep the current system with all of its deductions and all its paperwork, or you’d have a single page — I earned this amount, I have this number of dependents, here is 15 percent. My goal is to shrink the government to fit the revenue, not to raise the revenue to catch up with the government.
Tonight as my youngest brother and I drove around for a while, he lit up as much as the lights we were viewing. He was recounting to me the many times our mother described lights on the “lane” and it was endearing. Maybe that is why I prefer the colored lights so much, it relights those memories long forgotten.
And so it would go on. Sometimes it would be one of those conversations over a beer that would take a surprising turn.
I spoke to the kids and they are worried about their friends if I stay, but at the same time feel they really would like me to be here.
With the help of a few extra ( and reluctant ) hands,
Me: (Clearing my throat, getting a little antsy at this point) Ok, Ron…let’s move on to the other features of the android.
Thanks! Have a great Sunday! Only for more days until SPRING BREAK for me!!!!!!
This X-ray vision has a range of..............inches (at the most), so you won't be able to perv the next door hottie unless your a TSA guy, and you officer doper-doggies won't be able to watch what I'm doing inside my house because you have that Constitutional blanket protection called "The Sheriffs Hunch" to spy on my private home when I'm not doing anything illegal.
Along with his request for physical assistance, Nechtan asked for guidance in the correct calculation and maintenance of Easter tables. This question had been a matter of stigma among northern kings since the religious controversy at the 664 Synod (gathering) in Whitby (present Yorkshire) nearly 50 years before. Columban Iona maintained calculations by an antiquated calendar, a lumbering process which sometimes had east and west celebrating on wildly differing dates; Anglian Northumbria was more modern, calculating according to tables approved by popes in Rome.
Over on Rainbow Lady this week the challenge is a sponsored one and as we are being sponsored by Pinflair then you will understand where the the idea for the challenge came from. You could choose pyramage, decoupage or any 'age' you can think of and that gives you plenty of scope.
The 1976 FA Cup Final between Man Utd and Southampton is being shown on TV right now, it's funny how times have changed, not a foreigner on the pitch don't you know?
I started by using Frog Tape (which I'll get to later) to tape off the trim on both sides and the floor.
Today I decided to make another version of these beautiful fabric flowers. This time I decided to use muslin, because I'm going to be adding them to a muslin pillow I'm dreaming up. I've seen several tutorials on how to make these rolled flowers, but the one I used is found here at "Everyday Chaos." (Thank you, Bridget, for an awesome tutorial.)
I fully understand that time becomes a burden to me only when it is empty.
What is the Diet Solution program?
According to Abigail there's nothing like Pajama Day at preschool. She's been talking about this since the school year started! Boy was she excited to wear her nightgown and slippers to school today!
Doesn’t matter where you’ve been,
(The A says “ah",” The A says “ah,” every letter makes a sound the A says “Ah”)
In September, that will change, thanks to an early morning ticket purchase. I will be on the field at Citizen's Park. I will see, at long last, Springsteen for myself.
I absolutely love this shot--everyone signing those iconic words.
2. Proclaims that which is not of God
You see, there was one restaurant that we visited once, it wasn’t even able to send out consistent dishes from the kitchen on the same day when we ordered the same thing!
I could seriously post every piece of furniture from their website, but I have narrowed it down to a few....
*Fair dinkum - genuine
It was a nice reminder to me to be thankful for the "storms" in life,
And since we're on the subject -- this thing going around FB?
Each week, writing these posts are almost therapeutic. That, despite the craziness and "busyness," despite the ups and downs of parenthood and everyday life, we need to take the time to realize all for which we have to be grateful, all that we may take for granted. I often wonder how much beauty around me I didn't even notice because of the hectic nature of life. We are given such precious gifts each and everyday. I am doing my best to literally stop and smell the roses. I owe my children no less. I truly believe it is this appreciation, gratefulness and special times together that they will remember someday when with their own children or long after I am gone. It isn't whether you had a flawless house, it isn't if you were rich and famous, it is all about whether or not you have made a difference in the life of a child. In our world today, I truly believe it is the pursuit of the first two things that lead to the neglect of the last, the most important of all.....
Luckily for the rest of us, once the solids finally do hit the propeller-blades, there is no honour among thieves. This morning, the equally unpleasant FIFA trougher Jack Warner has released an email suggesting that there was no way Sepp Blatter could have been unaware of the Qatar bung. And a little bird tells me that the Wapping liars are having one helluva job treading a careful line between giving their Guilty Men vast amounts of spondoolicks….and suddenly finding they’ve turned Queen’s evidence in order to get a lighter sentence.
It’s still overwhelming at times and I feel unfit many days. Never having played “hairstylist” as a child, I have no idea how to fix up my daughters’ long tresses. I kind of fumble around with nail painting and wouldn’t know how to behave in a nail salon if I ever grew brave enough to enter one. I’m no fashion expert and zero help with their ballet lessons. I still hate shopping.
This is going to be a long and difficult post. It's okay if you want to go look at pictures of disapproving rabbits or read a funny dyke blog and learn lots of new terms for dykes...go right ahead. I've done plenty of both in the last few days, and it's far more enjoyable than anything else going on in my life right now.
When I was reading back on some of my journal entries from the past few months, I think I was doing a self pity thing - and it's okay to feel sorry for yourself every so often, but when you start pitying yourself and only looking at the negative things, I really think that those things become your complete focus, and it becomes impossible to see the positives.
I'm not sure what I will do with the "awards". I certainly don't plan on needing them any time soon to add to a resume. I don't really want to put them on the wall or take up space on any shelves. They may take a trip to the burn pit, since they serve little purpose at this point in my life.
An hour into them, after reading through notes and queries in the margins, approving comma edits and tweaking word choices, I instantly wanted to go back to drafting. When I was writing book two, everything was up to ME. I was in complete control — over the story, the characters, the words, everything. Copy edits were making my brain hurt. They were making me hate every word I originally wrote in book one.
The intellectual property rights to this development have been safeguarded by Patent, allowing the details to be freely accessible in the pubic domain (the source for the picture at the top of this article). My attention was drawn to this development by Italian Mechanical Engineer Rodolfo De Vita, a specialist in Torsional Dampers and Dual Mass Flywheels (DMF).
In a large stockpot, sauté the sausage over medium heat until brown. Add the onion, bell pepper, jalapeño and garlic. Sauté until onions are clear. Stir in the cumin, oregano, chili powder and coriander. Add the chicken stock and bring to a boil. Reduce heat to medium low and simmer
So just to clarify for anyone who fancies going along this evening and you really should. I am more than sure that it will be worth it. You need to see this chappy perform - You really do. You will not regret it.
Just today we were looking for winter hats and all the 6-12 month old size hats were gigantic on her. Poor girl is stuck with the newborn winter hats. :( What a peanut!
all pins tucked away.
P.S. In the month of May, I will posting only once a week, on Fridays, as I have set a deadline for the first draft of my Half-blood Angels and Devils book. I need to complete the first draft by the end of this month. I will still be visiting all your blogs. If I complete the draft before that, I will revert back to my usual blog schedule of twice a week.
I’ve also been working on changing my life by apologizing to all the people I’ve hurt in the past. One of the first people I apologized to was a girl named Julia King. Julia King was someone whom I had known for years and used all the time. That was our relationship, We would use and abuse each other, she would take it to the next level and then lie her butt off to everybody about what We did out of shame. However, I never really cared about that. After high school I started dating this wonderful person who knew her in high school and I debunked every lie she ever told. So I apologized for that. It went a lot better then I expected! She was cruel as expected but I was strong and calm! I was very proud of myself because I didn’t think I was ready yet!
Her voice faded and for a long while she sat in a strange reverie. Christopher respected her silence despite the tumult his mind struggling to escape in innumerable questions.
After class and my 30 minute commute back to Happy Hometown, Illinois, I pick up Sassafras from practice.
Mr Davies also tries to answer the question of how a Western software developer can give a client in China a jump-start asset and let them customize it, while at the same time protecting their intellectual property?
Join the Movement to Save Our Children!
By Kerri-Ann Haye-Donawa.
2 market
Shortly after hanging up from that call, another broker called that I was also working with to see whether his client had contacted me. I told him no, the amount was far less than what I wanted but I’d entertain it all the same. This whole frustrating process of trying to get my boat sold taught me much about the boat sales industry, what people said and did were complete opposites, the importance of having proper paperwork and contracts, and to keep meticulous notes on everything. Still to this day – if I see any trouble in any of my dealings, I tend to keep track of it all as you never know when you’ll have to go back later and memory tends to forget many things.
Many of the other pieces here are just trite and forgettable. Nobuhiro Suwa wastes the excellent Juliette Binoche in a lame attempt to tug at heartstrings with a story of a mother grieving for her dead son. She runs into the street and encounters a cowboy — Willem Dafoe, channeling the infamous cowboy of David Lynch's Mulholland Dr. — who briefly reunites her with her son. It's pointless surrealism and pointless maudlin tripe, especially since it ends with the woman rapturously telling her husband that God has given her strength. Huh? God's a cowboy? I guess? Bruno Podalydès' Montmartre is just inoffensive and boring in comparison, a meet-cute in which a lonely man romances a woman who faints by his car. Oliver Schmitz's segment similarly suffers from its bland premise, in which a female paramedic cares for a man who's been stabbed, while flashbacks show that the events that led to this moment include the man's romantic obsession with the paramedic, who he'd pursued ever since randomly running into her in a parking garage some time before. It's an O. Henry-esque bit of irony that hardly seems earned by these inconsequential, ill-defined characters. In Bastille, Isabel Coixet uses voiceover narration to tell the compressed story of a man who is about to leave his wife until he learns that she is dying, at which point he devotes himself to her anew and falls in love all over again. The voiceover essentially provides a summary of what might have been an interesting movie if it had actually played out with some detail, some real scenes and real characters. As is, it's like a pitch for a movie rather than an actual story in itself.
If you think a Chihuahua doesn't have much in common with a Rottweiler, you might be on to something.
Return to find man sharing table.
My husband chewed over the question. "Well, I'm sure Arnie's mistress was good looking at some point."
I remember the spin art kit my kids played with when they were young. Well, when I was watching my granddaughter (before she started school), we would spend some time playing on the computer. One of her favorite places was nickjr. and we found a spot where you could generate spin art. We made sheets and sheets of spin art and printed a lot of them. I have since made a few of these on my own and found that it is better to email them to myself and then print from the image I save from the email. I can get two spin arts on a page and resize if I like. If you check this site out, you have to move the bottle around quite a bit to get it to put down color. It is a lot of fun, even if you are a tad older than a Nickjr.
Who only, when snowstorms flared
On April 30, C-jes Entertainment, JYJ’s agency, released the teaser poster of Junsu’s first solo album on JYJ’s official Facebook account (www.facebook.com/CJESJYJ).
SPECIAL ATTACKS: Poison
My current neighborhood lies at the very top of a long, narrow valley that, after 20 miles of descent through multiple and varied microclimates, opens out onto vast plains of sandy desert to the South. For three of the four years I have lived here, I have lived “down below,” amidst the red rocks, high canyon walls and the dry, open landscape of arroyos, juniper and pinion pine.
Before I go into the discussion about the film, it’s important to note that the two ex-Syrians on the panel (including a recent refugee) and one in the audience – all Muslims – were quick to say, “This is not Syria.” While an overwhelming majority of the Syrian population is Muslim, it remains a secular state, and Bashar’s military government is known for capitalising on religious differences to control the population divide & conquer-style. So keep this in mind before forming an opinion on Syria based on this discussion.
And did I mention that I crocheted with it and it works like a charm!
On a personal note, I like to share a photo of my daughter Stephanie who is running the Mental Health campaign awareness in her university. It was her idea to write the message on the chalk board and she plans to take photos of students behind the messages.
1 commoners
In the house of His servant David.’
Some mailers like a glossy look for their direct mail pieces. But please keep in mind that even if you use sustainable paper, some coatings (e.g.: UV Coating) can render your piece non-recyclable. It’s great to use paper that has recycled content, but I feel that making sure your pieces can continue to be recycled is even more important.
God's Great Glory!
Post what you read last week and what you're planning to read this week then link to Shelia's post. Then visit, visit,visit! She has a comment contest going on each week tied to the meme.
For some reason I always need some down time when I start taking a new medication. Actually it is two new medications; I’m taking one for depression and one for high blood pressure. I haven’t been able to concentrate on only one of my three blogs. But as usual life does go on.
OSP investigators are continuing to try to determine what caused the Volvo to slide broadside into oncoming traffic.
Now, the point of this is that our make-believe President has declared to the world that we (the United States) are a bunch of torturers. Thus it will be OK to torture us next time when they catch us…because that is what the U.S. does.
It makes a wonderful gift - my children would like their own personalised "likes" prints and I already have a couple more in mind as gifts for friends with special birthdays coming up.
How do you write?
Rubin is accompanied throughout by trumpeter William Sperandei (except “AQ Giraffe”), recalling a front-line not entirely dissimilar to the one Ron Miles made with Bill Frisell a few years back, and a rhythm section consisting of the occasional keyboards of Dafyyd Hughes, bassist Steve Zsirai and drummer Ryan Granville-Martin, all of whom sound as if their backgrounds are outside of traditional jazz circles, a rather welcome state of affairs.
With each possibility come quiet warnings, and the pink paint heightens the sense that these visions don’t have a chance, that they are day dreams in a world too tired for dreaming. In terms of a return to the African Garden of Eden, I recalled the story about a group of African Americans who returned to Ghana in the hopes of making a life there, tossing their U.S. Passport into the ocean only to return to the same beach week later, looking for their documents. In thinking of the African Americans in French Rococo, we think of the Middle Passage, the violent separation of families, and the horrors of slavery – the events happening while Aristocrats had conquests in gazebos and hothouses. And of the possibility that this fantasy landscape could be the U.S.? Well, it throws into sharp relief the reality of things, the ongoing turmoil of the inner city, the struggles that Africa Americans still have to overcome.
4.) RESEARCH BEFORE DOING THE MOBILE ASSIGNMENT- The mobile assignment wasn’t tough, but many people were freaking out about it because they were afraid they wouldn’t be able to find an on-campus event to cover. What helped me out a lot was logging onto Mizzou’s event calendar and seeing what exhibits would be up at which places, which club would be holding which sale, etc. Also, remember to utilize Speaker’s Circle, Memorial Union and the Student Center-there’s usually always SOMETHING going on at these places. Remember, the event doesn’t necessarily need to be interesting-it just needs to be an event for you to complete your mobile assignment on time!
Him: Did a French or American company offer you a job?
mike minahan Says: May 21, 2011 at 10:39 pm
08-28 Bergen, Norway - Bergenhus Festning-Koengen
So recently we went to get some pictures taken of the boys, for Easter (and posterity). They were done in a small photography studio in somebody's home, with bunnies. Since it's almost Easter, I'm going to share them with you:
These individuals have a way of articulating principles and have very good memories. Since they are considered impartial, teams are more open to receive feedback or decisions even if the decision goes against them. – Courtesy Scribd.com
Hubby: I don’t see us getting divorced.
Nothing defines our traditions more than the food that we eat, and nothing reflects who we are more clearly than our local markets. A morning spent weaving through labyrinths of vendors and stalls can transport you into the warmth and comfort of a cocina where families gather for their daily meals. It is here, in the city’s biggest kitchen, where you can feel the heartbeat of the city’s core from where food trickles through its blood vessels into every household. In return, bountiful offerings from the land and the sea are brought back to the market every day to continue the endless circle of life. The market is a place of nourishment and a way of life.
It was much better, of course, when the extended family was still strong, and when people lived in real communities -- not 'communities' as the left likes to use that word today. People often lived in the same town or county for most, or all, of their lives. Fewer people lived in urban areas where people can live all their lives without even knowing their neighbors, much less caring for them.
I fail at keeping blogging/emailing/computer'ing promises. FAIL.
Jazbo Dan & His Yodelin' Band - Evans
Third, and most distressingly, the Court's exclusion of "abstract intellectual concepts" stems from an out-of-context combination of two statements from old cases that did not even involve intangible processes. The first statement--"an idea of itself is not patentable"--is from the 1874 Rubber-Tip Pencil decision. The second statement--"a principle, in the abstract" is not patentable--is from the 1852 Le Roy opinion. The tenor of the two cases is, contrary to the implication of Benson, a positive one: that an "idea" or a "principle" is patentable when applied to create a novel and useful process or product even though the idea or principle itself is not patentable because it is either well known or too abstract. Rubber-Tip Pencil held that a patent on attaching a rubber eraser to a pencil was invalid for lack of novelty. The Benson-quoted phrase--"An idea of itself is not patentable"--was meant, in context, to say that a "good idea" for a product (good from a business or marketing point of view) did not meet the patentability requirements if the product itself lacked novelty (or was an obvious modification of the prior art from a technical point of view).Finally,
You can check out Carol's work and see how the rest of the design team was inspired by her by visiting the Webster's Pages Inspire Me page. Thanks for looking today! :)
One reason for the encryption is that once a deal is discovered and publicized, the airline quickly fixes the problem.
I just found Pearl's blog, a few weeks ago. It's one of the few blogs I read that doesn't have pictures to help me figure out what she's writing. I know, I have to wind up my brain and pretend like I'm literate. Go check her out, her posts are good for a little chuckle.
Presented By: New Jersey Center for Biomaterials
The worse news is that this is likely to be only the first round of welfare-state corrections. The next decade will usher Europe into the age of aging, when inevitably the cost of pensions will rise and providing health care for the elderly will be an even bigger cost
Heeeeeeeey friends! I'm back! I survived another high-energy, thrilling, EXHAUSTING EVMCO concert! Thank you to all who came out to support us -- I hope we rocked your world. And if you couldn't make it, I'm sorry! You really missed an amazing show. But don't worry -- future concerts are on the horizon. I'll be sure to keep you posted, of course.
Chris Witte
Uh, that's sixteen ways to enter. Yeah, a little overkill maybe, but these are awesome prizes! Good luck! A winner will be drawn and announced at the end of next week!
Not too long ago, Christian converted a Eureka warrior frog in response to Romi's characteristic complaint of "how come there aren't any girl ones?" Eureka loved it and are now casting the frog princess - Princess Romina!
My name is Chanyeol. Birth name is Park Chanyeol.
SLOE VODKA
I’ve been dating this guy for 2 years and I think he may be the one… But my family and friends still hold a grudge against him! He’s a former drug addict and has a violent past, but that’s been more than 3 years ago. He’s a changed man now but is still getting judged for his past mistakes. How can I get everyone I love to accept my boyfriend for who he is and not what he’s done in the past?
She also does not use maternal language to the exclusion of paternal language, so Jewett would not be too concerned about her usage but would probably praise her ability to integrate these images so smoothly into her descriptions. In fact, Jewett actually declares that “the church needs to teach that God is as much like a mother as like a father” (139), and thus Julian does.
The Immortal Rules is the first Julie Kagawa book I have read and to be honest I wasn’t really sure who she was before reading this (I know, I know I must be living under a rock or something.) So I wasn’t quite sure why The Immortal Rules was garnering so much attention and excitement. It seems as though this book is a bona-fide hit months before its release, there is just so much hype about it.
Now, it’s Brent’s turn. He is in the brig, which means he can have one action. Frank and Mink are trying to get him to Executive Order me, so I can go shoot things or work on getting people out of the brig, or SOMETHING.
Second I have my bed by my little pond that I have populated with some goldfish, I have some in there that are two years old. For this bed I planted daisies (Shasta) by seed, I have three tubers of dahlias, and a couple of the ornamental thistles. I believe that when they all grow I can sit on my bench and view my pond, enjoy my goldfish, and have the benefit of beautiful flowers behind me. On the man-made bent tree….there are Shasta daisies in a hanging basket to enjoy. Oh and don’t comment on the weeds surrounding my bench, that will be taken care of. Actually some weeds are not bad, they add flavor and compost.
The writer, I was shocked to find, was the other Alan’s stepniece; she told me she had known him since she was 5. Her letter laid out the family’s relationships — I knew that Alan was estranged — and then concluded on a melancholy note.
and I don't want to miss sharing all the fabulous
I have serious problems with each phase of this argument.
Mostly, I just say "crap" when I am frustrated. I'm not exactly proud of it, but it's not that bad, right?
Kinda like being my own boss.
Interestingly Huawei also have an updated Honeycomb build. This seems to be mainly because the amount of ICS devices in the market is still rather low (less than 5%) with the key players Amazon, Samsung still yet to roll out ICS for most of their popular devices. Hence application compatibility with ICS is still a problem.
ever have those days - wanna take out the 'redo' card and slam it on the table - where you just wanna hit 'rewind' - get all the way to the part when your just about to get out of bed - THEN at that moment - don't! - stay in bed for that day - b/c the day ahead of you is just too much to handle! - YUP, my day yesterday!
Starting from the short side, roll up the dough jelly roll style. Put the dough onto loaf pan and let sit for another hour. Towards the end of rising time, preheat oven @ 190C.
There were two workshops on forensics, both given by retired forensics expert, Tom Adair. (And, he's going to be my guest on May 8th). Both were "hands on" which made a great change from sitting and taking notes.
I grew up in North America. My parents where Europeans, they immigrated to N-America in the early seventies. There my father, at the age of 33 years old, found Christ and also adopted me shortly after.
-Last Satuday night, my husband and I attended a concert at our community center. The band "Chilliwack" was performing. They are a great Canadian rock band from Vancouver, and had many hits in the 70's and 80's. We were up dancing and singing, it was a rockin' good time! However....you know you are getting old, when you look around and everyone at the concert is old!
Sigh. Oh well. I guess it could have turned out green or worse, my hair could have fallen out. I think I'll be washing my hair every ten minutes now.
wow, our pool is GREEN!! YUCKY! yep, after our birthday party on the 1st, with all the kiddos jumping in after playing hard and sweating all day, it just killed the pool!!! :( and since james is gone for 2 weeks, who gets to clean it up?! ME!! OH WELL...i just hope i can do it...i am PRAYING that today's treatment is IT...if not, it is dumping the water and doing it again...sign...pools are sooo much work but so much fun..
Rather than flitting and fretting about what may or may not happen this afternoon in regards to the new car, I decided to sit down and take/make notes on my Dragon's Way. For ten minutes. Before making lunch for the kids.
Day 2 everything got turned into these.
But this is my lent, God is showing us, myself that He is in control, not I and that I need to let go of things and of relationship and trust Him and only Him.
Because I wasn't going to stay
Two of my favorite TV show are ending this year. One Tree Hill and Desperate Housewives. I have watched these shows since the beginning and have not missed an episode. I know these are just fake lives, stories on film but I cant help but feel like my best friends are breaking up with me. I feel sad, hurt and overwhelmingly disappointing that these relationships I've watched are about to be over. I know this might be silly but I feel the same way I do as when I finish reading a book series or a really long and good book.
Before I announce our brand new challenge...I just want to say a huge thank you to all of you that applied to join our new DT...it was so hard to choose and we wish we could have had you all...lol...
It is near impossible to establish a forensic ballistic identification with bullets fired from these homemade devices.
So while you're probably better off consuming something other than a beer after your long run, as long as you are well hydrated, go right ahead and have one. After all, you deserve it.
I also didn’t understand the obligation to say hi to people you know in school. I mean, I get it if you bump into someone you know in places other than school, because that will be like Oh I didn’t know you’re here, what a coincidence we are at the same place, hello. But in school, greeting people seemed redundant. I mean, we were in the same school, of course we’ll see each other along the corridors. Why on earth would it be surprising to see people you know walking around the school? When you go to school, you know who you’re going to see. It’s going to be the same people there. It’s not going to change overnight. Greeting people was like saying “Hey I can see you. I know I’ll always see you because we actually go to the same school, but I’ll still say Hello I can see you, everyday for the rest of the years that we will be here in the same school, I have to remind you that I can see you Hello.“
In general, women’s earnings have become a much more intrinsic part of a family’s financial well-being over the past few decades, said Ellen Galinsky, co-founder of the Families and Work Institute.
by Kari Diane Pike
Oh, I’m sure that, coached by Times Co. lawyers and PR people, you could give me a nice talk about “ethics” and the appearance of objectivity and all that other happy horseshit. And all that stuff might even work on a half-bright marmoset who had never heard of Judy (“I was proved f–king right”) Miller and is never subjected to the factual inaccuracies, contextual ignorance, economic illiteracy and sociopathic contempt for the nonwealthy that makes up the Times op-ed page these days. But don’t try that shit on anyone else. You’d be wasting the very expensive time of your legal counsel.
25If we live in the Spirit, let us also walk in the Spirit.
2012: In foal to Midnight Lute
He will eat spaghetti bolognaise, but only because I have a picture of him eating it as a toddler. He also won't eat rice so I will fix a few chips for him on Saturday to go with his tiger prawns and give him the veg on the side - another deconstructed dish so to speak for him.
I always imagined Elvis when he was a child, sitting on the wooden stairs, on the porch of his house, holding his little guitar, playing songs he heard in Memphis, or playing the old songs he heard when he lived in Mississippi..
Bruce Wilson – The Vancouver AIDS Memorial. I won the commission in an open competition to sculptors, artists and designers around the province. Arthur Erickson ~ my lifelong hero~ chaired the jury and voted for my entry. It was an unpopular project at the time ~ fuelled mainly by homophobia ~ and it was a struggle that required tireless commitment by all those involved. My proudest moment was at the unveiling where I was asked to speak about my experience in completing the project.
All of which leaves me with an odd taste, as though I’ve just bitten into a gypsum apple. Or witnessed the Queen of Hearts’ croquet game in a postmodern Wonderland. You know, with dhimmi-socialist premises and their practitioners as hedgehog balls and flamingo mallets, imported soldiers of Islam as both wickets and executioners, and the Mad Hatter making an appearance at the end to express his incomprehension why the event went awry, and singularly so. For variations of the Burqa bla-bla operetta are performed regularly on university campuses across the West.
A North Naples man is accused of threatening his wife with a handgun after she told him she wanted to separate.
Wilson’s major concern was time; he had promised the Libyans that he would set up a manufacturing laboratory near Tripoli for the production of assassination weapons in August. Qaddafi, in turn, promised to pay him $1 million in cash immediately upon arrival of the first batch of timers, explosives and other equipment that would be needed. Manufacturing the weapons themselves in Libya would be no problem; men such as John Harper, who was paid more than $2,000 a week by Wilson and Terpil, agreed to go to Libya and begin training Libyans in the art of disguising explosives in ashtrays, flowerpots, lamps and other household goods that could be triggered by delayed timing devices. Scientific Communications came through on its promise to deliver the prototype timers within 30 days. The Texas company had handled legitimate and sensitive contracts for the C.I.A., but this one was different and the firm’s president, Joe Halpain, knew it. He personally delivered the timers, hidden in plastic-prescription bottles for export to Libya, to a motel near C.I.A. head-quarters, where they were picked up by Wilson and Mulcahy. Far more difficult were the issues of where to purchase the volatile chemical explosives needed for the production of the assassination weapons and how to slip them into Libya. The necessary explosives included TNT and a variety of lethal plastiques-among them RDX, formally known as cyclotrimethylenetrinitramine-which were designated as Class A explosives by the Department of Transportation and could not be shipped on passenger and cargo aircraft. Wilson and Terpil again reached into the ranks of C.I.A. contractors and found a California firm, J.S. Brower and Associates of Pomona, which agreed to supply the chemicals, all of which were considered defense articles that could not be exported without Federal licensing. One problem remained: how to get the timers and explosives into Libya. In early August, 1976, Mulcahy attended a meeting at the offices of Inter-Technology in Washington with a cargo sales manager of Lufthansa German Airlines, which has passenger service from Germany to Tripoli. The sales manager, Walter Doerr, categorically refused to ship the explosives, legally or otherwise, on a passenger craft. And he refused to charter a special cargo plane because of the high risk of explosion. Later that day, Terpil arranged a meeting with Jerome S. Brower, the 61-year-old president of Brower and Associates, who was a highly respected figure in his industry (and later was asked to advise Congress’s Office of Technology Assessment on a proposed method of marking and tracing explosives used in international terrorism). Brower was shown a list of all the chemicals that Inter-Technology wanted to purchase for the Libyan operation. Mulcahy recalled that Brower immediately exclaimed: ”Hey, you don’t need all this stuff for mine clearance.”
I will even make a road in the wilderness
The answer is not just a word but the Word; not an idea but a person. Clues are abstract, persons are concrete. Clues are signs; they signify something beyond themselves, something real. Our solution cannot be a mere idea, however true, profound, or useful, because that would be only another sign, another finger, another clue—like fingers pointing to other fingers, like having faith in faith, or hope in hope, or being in love with love. A hall of mirrors.
Out from Foskett's Alloys,
A group of six friends used to play a lot together, till a fateful day came where one of them, Meiko (Menma) Honma, died in an incident. The remaining five grew apart and now live very different lives without much contact with each other. Years later, after a certain summer, the former leader of the group, Jinta (Jintan) Yadomi has abandoned high school for a whole semester and starts living as a shut-in. During this time, the ghost of Menma appears before him and asks him to grant her wish. The problem is, nobody of the group of friends nor Menma herself know what her wish might be. On top of that the Menma’s ghost can only be seen and heard by Jintan.
- If I'm really being nitpicky, the cakes had "muffin tops." While I like them on muffins, I thought they made the cupcakes a little awkward to eat. But that's truly nitpicking.
The title page for the 5 different types of tour have had the photos and descriptions updated. All photos optimised for the web.
My messages, that are always from various voices of real men on this planet,
Ink - Images where stamped with black stazon and coloured with Distress ink (antique linen, walnut stain, bundled sage, pumice stone, tumbled glass and black soot)
I will be on the road a lot this year, and so if you need a speaker or group session, or simply a boost from our audience, please refer to the About or Readings pages here for information on how to go about this.
The Stargate program has just begun operation beneath Cheyenne Mountain for the first time in years; the United States Air Force is sending four-person teams through the Stargate to other worlds for the purposes of exploration, tactical analysis, and the acquisition of advanced technology, primarily weaponry.
Out-of-pocket charitable deductions. Most people remember to deduct checks they paid to charity if they itemize. But you can also deduct the expenses you incurred in helping out a charity, such as the cost of ingredients for a dish for a soup kitchen, stamps for a mailing, copying, and car mileage (14 cents a mile). And don’t forget to count any money you’ve had transferred automatically from your paychecks to charity.
All while holding my hand and guiding me and nurturing me and givng me a safe place to grow.
10.CIRCUS LUPUS "Pop Man"
Now I have to do the following…
“Access to a Legacy,” as the project is called, marks the first time a presidential library established in the paper age has fully committed itself to the digital era. The amount of material to be posted online in January is huge — 200,000 pages of text, 1,500 photos, 1,250 files of audio recordings and moving images, and 340 phone conversations totaling 17 1/2 hours — but represents just a small portion of the collection….
Children’s Time
Just called De Boeck by the friendly shop assistant of the excellent De Biertempel outlet in Brugge, which I found better organised and more spacious (and certainly less overcrowded by Japanese tourists) than their main outlet in Brussels. The nickname Boeck derived from the painting on the label ("Nightlights" by Felix de Boeck).The 75 cl champagne bottle, with the bottle date, 21 November 1998, handwritten on the back side, cost what is seen as a small fortune in the Belgian beer market, an amazing 10 Euro. What is more amazing to me is that a vintage champagne among beers cost the same (in Belgium, that is) as I had to pay at the Norwegian state liquor store today for one of their cheapest red wines. Maybe the undervaluation of world-class beers in Belgium is really what I should celebrate. And the fact that I am able to be there quite a few times every year to pick up my treats without asking for an extra credit line with my bank.
Dr. Jack Travis defends his clinic like he’s commander of the Alamo. He’ll fight the community’s efforts to shut its doors, even if he must use Riley Hale’s influential family name to make it happen.
Murano is the glassblowing island. The glassmaking industry was moved there from Venice in 1291 so that the glass furnaces were not such a fire risk to the city. Glassmaking techniques were closely-guarded secrets and glassmakers were not permitted to leave the islands.
My daughter Michelle joined us for dinner as it was her off day.
Both prize winners will be announced on the Monday afternoon Unity/ippity blog post
Like I how slipped that positive spin in there anyway? Damn! Habits are hard to break. Where are my pom poms?
The photo above is of a voltage meter borrowed from a very nice plumber who came to my house to do some work. I photographed it and added it to my “Tools of a Trade” portfolio. I place it in this post because there is a simplicity to this time-worn tool telling you the critical information you need.
8. Solitude Is Bliss - Tame Impala
Well, we found great tea, coffee and cake in York in the end, but it took us 4 or 5 trips to find it. It’s shocking how a city like York, which has hundreds of thousands of visitors every year, has so many tea rooms, cafés and coffee shops serving up soulless, mediocre food and drink. Perhaps it’s because there is such a massive footfall that they get away with poor quality and service.
She was excited because this little boy has never heard of God. He doesn’t know Him or anything about Him. As she talked I continued to remember the verses that came on the screen after the “Go Ye Therefore” Banquet the other night.
Welcome to Arrow Beach (C, 1973) aka Tender Flesh, And No One Would Believe Her This was chopped to hell before it was released, and now it's rarely seen at all (there's rumored to be only one print left in existence), which is way too damned bad because there's something about this movie... Icy eyed Meg Foster (who has nude scenes) is a hippie girl hitch hiking around California and she ends up having dinner with Lawrence Harvey (who died of cancer before this was released) and his skittish sister Joanna Pettet. They eat some extremely rare meat that's apparently pieces of a dead cop. Harvey developed a taste for cannibalism during the Korean war, and suffers from flashbacks that drive him to kill. Meg spends the night and wakes up to a weird chopping sound and eventually finds him in a basement meat locker hacking up a corpse with a cleaver. She escapes and goes to the cops (John Ireland and Stuart Whitman) but they think she's just been taking drugs and had a bad trip, and won't believe her accusations. Meanwhile Harvey lures an aging local slut to his house so he can take pictures of her... but he kills her in an extremely stylish scene composed of quick flash cuts patterned after the still pictures an automatic camera is winding off. Meg eventually finds someone willing to suspend their disbelief enough to go back to the house with her... Nice, atmospheric horror really gets butchered when shown on TV; they cut so much of it that you can't even really tell he's a killer, much less a cannibal. Uncut, it's pretty gory, but in a suggestive way - you only see quick glimpses of bloody meat, so you're not even quite sure exactly what you're looking at, but it's morbid, brutal, and highly effective. The theme song "We Are Born To Die" sets the atmosphere up right off the bat, and it's also strange because it's done by Lou Rawls! DVDs are scarce. Videotapes supposedly run 99 minutes, but I'm not certain about that. One of my absolutely favorite horror films, seek it out.
Another example of an underutilized space might be the interim surface parking lot FCR plans for the eastern portion of the site. The AtlanticYards.com FAQ section explains that public money would help fund infrastructure improvements like "public parking garages," but I couldn't find any mention of that parking lot.
Creating a mix of textures and color will definitely make your small space bigger. Of course there should be some design style and balance here - use colors or patterns in a complementing palette. For example consider using all warm tones - reds, oranges, yellows or patterns - stripes, dots, zig zags. You need to add in some neutral balance as well - like Anna's wood console table or the white coffee table. Again, balance in a small space means all the difference in opening up the room.
Yes, it’s the first league table of the season
Painting Techniques
* Corner Lot
A Gentleman need not resemble Hollywood’s George Hamilton when seeking that healthy glow. Merely opting for warmer colours instead of colour-sapping blacks and whites can lift the complexion and take the greyness out of a five o’clock shadow.
Having contracted mediocrity, those around the infected leader / manager start to believe the elaborate explanatory narratives warning external forces are contriving against them and, the laws of NLP obliging, the next victim starts to watch as their performance takes a prophetic nosedive.
Until all my friends show up whose kids are from the other school, which is totally who’s colors I’m wearing!
Beyond the entryway is a scene of devastation like nothing he has seen before. The entire room is a wreck- chairs and handcrafted furniture shattered to pieces and strewn everywhere, animal skins lying here and there on the wooden floor, some so badly torn that the creature it came from is unrecognizable. Every glass window has been shattered to let the dust in on the breeze. It wouldn’t come until later in the night, with any luck.
Hope you all have a wonderful day wherever you are.
So last week one of my wisdom teeth abscessed. Or at least it hurt like an abscess. So I decided I better go and get stuff taken care of. I'll spare everyone the details but 3 hours, 3 pulled teeth, and a filling later I am laying on the couch praying the pain doesn't get too bad. I'm ok right now. I'm still very numb but I'm feeling a few "tingles". My appoinment wasn't painful, but it was rough. Again, I'll spare everyone the details and just say that I may actually be changing my views on nitrous oxide. I may not be that big of a fan anymore. Shoo Lord.
Last week I had a meeting with renowned Photographer Olga Hoffman. It was a fantastic meeting where she told me about a new project she was in the process of developing and working on. The project entitled 'how to wear a headscarf' would explore the diversity and journey of women of different faiths and background and the purpose of the scarf in their lives, ultimately exploring how they wear it to represent their own lives and cultures/religion even as a political symbol or even a fashion accessory. You can read more about the project and our meeting here.
*hugs* Heather x
"Tonight is my last night of bartending. I'm finally retiring and getting out from behind the bar. Can I get a moment of silence?
Arabs themselves were dreadful imperialists (700-1,000 A.D.) and every land they conquered is still dysfunctional today, according to Harvard economics professor, Eric Chaney: “Democratic Change in the Arab World, Past and Present,” in the April 7 Economist and Fareed Zakaria in Time, April 7. Wherever Arabs conquered, good governance and economic development were smothered, as they are today. This is even true for countries temporarily conquered but not converted to Islam by the Arabs (Spain, Portugal, Southern Italy).
Skins parties are indeed more and more popular. A “skins party” is a no-limit zone meant for teens (many of them are under 18 but who cares ?). The idea is to get S.A.D. (read Sex – Alcohol – Drugs) and to break all bans. Drugs dealers know they will make business and cushions are laid on the floors so that the orgy may take place. The party usually ends up with rounders throwing up, being unconsciously raped or collapsing into alcohol-induced coma. Getting S.A.D. is really those parties’ shallow purpose.
Over the past couple of weeks and months I have written and talked to people about how frustrated I have been with Governor/CEO/Entrepreneur/etc. Mitt Romney because of his rather incredible array of life experiences to bring to the table mixed with a campaign that has been full of half-truths and full on lies (if you haven’t been paying attention or don’t believe me go watch the video at the bottom). With that being said, I have also been very critical of the Republican nominating process for being so extreme – Romney and the nominating process existing at the same time has caused me to question the virtue of someone who has been so able and willing to change his positions to stay in a race. My initial reaction was to just say “he’s a liar, and lying is wrong, so he’s not my guy”. BUT, could it be possible that Mitt knows that the Republican party is self-destructing, and that the only way to keep some of their most important virtues alive (ie: hypothetical fiscal responsibility, government efficiency, limited federal powers) is to lie to them?… I’m not saying that I endorse the idea, but it seems to be what he is doing, and I can only come up with 2 reasons why he might do this: to be self-serving, or because he philosophically believe that it is best for the nation. I like to give people the benefit of the doubt, so I’m hoping that he is in it for the people. To his credit if he really is lying to make the world a better place, the political landscape in the country right now really is such a game that there isn’t much of any other option for a moderate who leans right, because if they lean left they are simply a mainstream Democrat from my estimation.
or too much on my plate? I don't know but the result is not a lot to show for my week ;( I guess we did have our first two room B&B - lots of prep ( tidying away stuff that should have been done earlier) & I did have a craft fair to get ready for, it was only a small one but it's got to look good still. It went ok, well, 3 cards, miserable weather & lots of families out for the egg hunt. But you've got to try. I didn't do any demonstrating as my buddies dog had been up all night ill. Wonderful setting on the green outside Rag Tag tho, so I didn't feel despondent, I felt I'd done my bit, i love the atmosphere. I do what I do & I enjoy it & I guess it's a question of getting it to the right market. I was asked by a customer would I take a workshop in Uist, the Outer Hebredies, so that was good....would I ?!
4- Transfer the mixture to a bowl, and add the vanilla and salt.
What could have been done more to my vineyard, that I have not done in it? wherefore, when I looked that it should bring forth grapes, brought it forth wild grapes?
La Rulles Triple
Those who know more and can do more get paid more. And they should!
Some bars need a dose of weirdness in their menus. Something beyond the typical seasonal and classic cocktails, something to give customers new tasting experiences. This occurred to me as I read an article in New York Magazine about how boring wine bars are, and my ideas were reinforced when I thought of a couple favorite Brooklyn bars that don’t change their cocktail menus as often as I’d like them too.
Such statements are useful for turning ignorance into a strength; The person behind the statement probably hasn't had enough close experience with that they dislike (which is generally understandable, do you spend a lot of time with art that irritates you?) so they take their limited phenomenological data and with it fashion a categorical statement that seems final and complete. Seen this, done with it, on with the next artifact of culture that needs codification. Progress!
So please let me know your HELPFUL HINTS and Suggestions for how to make this transition easier
Lifting you and me into a higher perspective on life.
10. Jennifer Hudson and Leona Lewis "Love Is Your Color"
embedded in their every cell,
I will upload them shortly.
We share the joy of being.
Shouldn't IBO have considered the arena naming rights--reported at $400 million over 20 years--as another lost (in part) opportunity cost and thus a benefit to the developer?
MY intent was threefold: exploring the world of global libraries, compare their own library IN THEIR OWN SCHOOL with how books are shared with students in another country, and be able to use transitional words and phrases that indicate compare and contrast. Students filled out a T chart for our own library and then picked a country featured in the book. To view the T chart, click below.
Funny how reading about the catastrophies of protagonists makes you feel better about your own life, and yet you wish you were them. Hmmm.
Samy Ghorbal, a Tunisian writer and political advisor to the opposition PDP, writes in Slate Afrique this week that while secularists celebrated Ennahdha’s abandonment of inscribing sharia law in the new constitution, they are ignoring the real problem – which is how the constitutional council interprets the constitution.
Smart growth policies will benefit our entire community, but we must join together in the effort to establish these policies in our communities first. Liberals, conservatives, and independents alike should stand together to implement these changes to improve our communities. No matter the demographics or political affiliations, smart growth will benefit us all.
2) People who tell secrets in front of you
I found a few old vintage cupcake trays at my vintage shop and I decided to alter a few to store some of the embellishments that I use the most. I had so much fun painting and altering this pan it matches my crafty room :) I hope you guys like this idea! Below you can see a Before & After Photo.
Keep in mind while you are attacking the grilled meat that you need to save room for the Mercado's wonderful desserts. Their flan is the perfect texture, creamy but not gelatinous or overly eggy with a nice scoop of dule de leche; it's definitely one of the best flans in town. But the dessert to die for at the Mercado is the panqueques with dulce de leche. It's really a crepe as opposed to what we would think of a pancake, bursting with dulce de leche and bruleed on top to create a textural triptych of crunchy burnt sugar, yielding to soft crepe encasing gooey dule de leche. I may go back just for those panqueques.
is drifting away
My information’s just not going in.
Also are you reading any great books? I am looking for some new reads for my nook :)
One of the simple joys in my life is opening the mailbox and finding a new cooking magazine in there! I love my magazines, mostly for the recipes, and will sit down with a cup of coffee or hot tea and commit to the hour it takes to read from cover to cover, dog-earring each page I want to refer back to for some awesome looking recipe, or decorating idea, or a gardening or exercise tip. Maybe it’s just me but it’s really disappointing when a magazine that specializes in food is full of sandwich, Panini, wrap, and hotdog recipes. Seriously? I suppose there are people out there who can benefit from these recipes, but…..(sigh). Even chicken recipes. Remember that cookbook called 1001 Ways To Cook Chicken? Well, as we all know by now there are about a million and 1 ways to cook chicken, but I don’t need 20 different recipes for lemon chicken from the same cooking magazine.
I coated the back of the envelopes with a fairly thick coat of metallic white acrylic paint and then, while the paint was wet, placed the photo face-down in the paint. Once the paint had dried, I dampened the back of the photo with a little water and rubbed very gently with my fingers to remove the paper. Once all of the layers of the paper were gone, the image was left in the paint. Some bits of the photo came off during the process but I didn't sweat it too much since the album overall has a kind of old and distressed look about it.
Place largest chocolate cake on icing board. Dip metal spatula into bowl of hot water, wipe off water on tea towel, and then scoop up some chocolate buttercream to ice chocolate cake. Try to use more buttercream than you need and then smooth off the excess. The heat from the hot water will help you to create a smooth appearance. Ice all of the cakes separately before stacking them. Using the piping bag, pipe star shape all around the edges of each layer. This will cover up any slightly imperfections around the bases of the cakes. Place flowers (from garden, or edible but don't use live flowers with lots of pollen) on each layer of cake for decoration. Chill in fridge so buttercream sets, but bring to room temperature to serve.
Summer is sailing by. I've got the Bigs enrolled in their new school and the Twinnies are first on the waitlist at one of the local preschools. We've already begun conditioning for our new Pop Warner teams. Can't believe we start 5/week on Monday!! We all know P.J. loves his football, so he's in hog heaven to be knee deep in cleats already. It's Reagan's first year, and he seems to be loving it, as well. Lord knows this is a ginormous investment in time for ALL of us, so I'm thrilled they love it so. But, dang it's going to be crazy to be on the opposite sideline this year. We were Saints for FOUR years!! Gulp. Go Mustangs!!
wetness to the sea, your absence
-Why would a God who created, be then unable or unwilling to involve Himself in His own creation?
Rava /Semolina - 1/2 cup
Does the “beauty” include having Stuckey’s presence scrubbed from the FCR web site, with no thank you, after his departure?
Lew Lewis was a harmonica playing maniac from Canvey Island who became an early member of Eddie & The Hot Rods in 1973. He ultimately tried to make it with his own band, scuffling around before signing with Stiff Records, which released his only album, titled “Save the Wail,” in 1979. I saw him twice that summer of ’79 and I can still picture him soaking his harmonicas in a pint glass and then flipping them wildly above his head as the band played ferociously behind him. He would spin around in mid song several times before sticking his hand out and pulling the harp out of the air to his mouth, quickly blowing some intense solos without missing a beat. He wasn’t a great singer and his record label had a hard time marketing a young, white Chicago Blues style harmonica player. This was the era when New Wave bands ruled with skinny ties and Power Pop’s jingle reverberated all around the world. Lew disappeared for a while and in 1987 made some minor headlines when he was sentenced to seven years in prison for holding up a post office with a fake gun. He’s had a number of illness and addiction issues throughout the last 15 years, but recently was still trying to get a new band together. He might’ve been just a bit player in the 1973–1985 U.K. music scene, but it’s people like Lew Lewis that add the unpredictable excitement that makes great rock music possible.
Peter: We are witnesses of everything.
And of course Kirsten Powers was entirely correct. I’m surprised that liberals didn’t declare a jihad on her the way they have on so many other strong independent women whom the left viciously and hatefully and frankly demonically attacked for wanting to be strong and independent in their own way rather than in Hillary Clinton’s and now Hillary Rosen’s way.
I honor my body as the temple of my soul;
One of the traditions my family had when I was growing up was to eat popcorn for dinner (supper) on Sunday night. I'm not even sure how it originated (Mom?), but in my quest to simplify our lives, I decided to continue it with my own family.
There are many formulas that lay claim as the best pathway toward great leadership. Just the other day a friend, who is an exceptional leader, raised a challenging notion. He remarked that the secret to great leadership doesn’t lie within a predetermined set of principles. He claimed that even though there is much written about great leadership it’s not what great leaders know but how they apply what they know that matters. He felt that great leadership is found in the finesse of its execution.
In the still of the early morning hours, I am able to completely reflect upon the birth of my second son. As I sit quietly, I can conjure up the sounds and feelings of that early morning water breakage, the fear of leaving our home the mother to one child and returning as the mother to two young boys. I can remember the craziness of standing in the elevator with my husband at the hospital, conversing with an old man who got on with us about the beautiful Sunday weather as water leaked out of me and contractions squeezed my body. A child moving softly within my body for the last few precious moments together. I can remember how there was nothing to watch but televangelists on the TV. How Dave and my doctor went to lunch at the local chinese restaurant while I sat alone, contemplating the day as it progressed. I had my yoga instructor come and help me with labor. Her visualizations and soft music lulling my mind into a calm place, even as my body struggled to move my child down the birth canal. Her softly holding my foot as the doctor tried to give me an epidural which would not take. A sweet, smiling doctor who two short weeks later would be dead from lung cancer. Who lingered outside the door as I labored, wishing he could do something for my pain of natural childbirth, but could not. I can remember the tunnel vision feeling of telling the nurses I felt great pressure. How they suddenly became very busy, turning the chest of drawers where I put my clothes into a place where their tools of the trade were placed to help my doctor bring my child into this crazy world. How the camera stuck and my frazzled husband opened the back of the camera and exposed the film of my last days of pregnancy and our oldest son's first blackberry picking with my Mom. There was to be no pictures of this birth. I can remember focusing on Gloria through each contraction, realizing that pushing Cullen out was not the same as pushing out Kadin. I can vividly remember the look of fear on my OB's face as my child crowned. Sternly he made me focus on him telling me he had to get the baby out, now, and I was to listen to him. I can remember the look that passed between him and my husband when Cullen's head came out, but his little body would not. In the confusion of nano-second, I can see in slow motion my husband thrusting his body across my belly, pushing the nurse out of the way, as he and Dr. Thornberry silently communicated. One pushing, one pulling, to release our child into the world. I can remember the unbearable pain passing into euphoria as he was expelled and placed upon my chest only to have the nurse freaking out at his grey color and thrusting oxygen into his face and vigorously rubbing his back as my sweet Cullen stared wide eyed. I can hear my husband telling the nurse to stop, that his body was pink, and he was ok. Only to look down into my child's face and see a new soul. A baby who was smash faced, grey in color, and all my own. The love that comes when you stare into your child's eyes. 15 minutes later I was on the phone with the cord blood place to schedule pick up, the pain of childbirth a short path behind me. Poor Cullen looked like he had been beat up, and I was not any better off. Pushing him so fiercely broke the blood vessels in my eyes and I looked like the victim in a cheap horror show. Painful for all to look at.
Also we have Carisa Zglobicki for her last challenge with us as the March Guest Designer. I want to thank Carisa for joining us this month and I hope you have enjoyed what she has had to share with us this month.
For the last few weeks, knowing the story has been reaching boiling point, I’ve been trying to find the various bits of it so I can sit down and plot the thing. Ha! Not a chance. It’s just not going to happen. Every time I try to sneak up on the story to unravel its secrets, it hurtles off and blows raspberries at me from behind a bush. Each time I try to cajole it and encourage it to reveal its inner workings to me, it slinks off and sulks. It becomes capricious, petulant and single-minded. Any attempt to pin it down, just makes it thoroughly elusive.
What do you do when you find yourself sitting down at your own kitchen table with a witch?
Meanwhile, I need to update everyone on upcoming certification classes and events.
I figured that I'd get a 1, since my blog is still very new, but I didn't!
Yeeah.
I really moved things around to make my workspace more efficient.
Me: No, baby. There's no computer here.
Considering how often I wax poetic about Levain, I figured it was time to do a proper posting for the bakery. And since I had another rendez-vous with the boys, I thought it was the perfect opportunity to spread the gluttony between three bellies.
Sang Sir Lancelot.
There’s an angel who runs a rare books shop.
Today Karen Schwaback explains how a combination of her membership of a professional writers' association and a very sensible sister led to her eventual publication despite her efforts to scupper her own success.
- I met my boyfriend's family. -
Yesterday was the 24th annual gay pride march in Northampton. Also the Taste of Northampton has been canceled because the vendors were losing money. Later a TV news report had Judy Matt announcing the cancellation of The Taste of Springfield. Had Matt in red in front of her plaques saying, "Sometimes you have to look at things in a business fashion."
Rebecca:Hi Victoria! how are you ? what is your plan for tonight ? im so excited.i will be making love with my valentine tonight,i don’t know what shall i buy for him ?
Art achieves holistic grace in that it is magic that tempers the forces of life but stands in awe against the uncontrollable chaos of death. It must grace both Apollo and Dionysus, otherwise it's not very good as art. If it's too structured, it becomes a (mainstream) video-game: put in specific data, get other, fancier but completely systematic data at the output, predictable as is may be pleasing. Most of modern metal is a video-game in this way: the consumer knows exactly what they're going to get for what they put in before they press play. Of course, humans cannot help being humans and even in the most predictable modernized vacuous metal records there are elements of chaotic death-reverie, startling jolts, no matter how brief and underachieved that remind of that other aspect of art, the dark reflection in the mirror pool: for you to live you must die a little.
Of trust in me, now I see what you want Lord, my absolute trust, and so family
Jillian at A Room of One’s Own has started The Classics Club. Many of you know that I am working my way through the 1001 books you must read before you die. As you can imagine, this list includes many classics. Jillian’s challenge is to read a list of classics over the next five years. And you get to select your own classics. Below you will find my list of 50 classics that I would like to read over the next half decade. 50 is the minimum for the challenge, but you can commit yourself to reading many more if you want. I wanted to leave room for contemporary novels. The goal is to read the classics on your list and to blog about them. You can combine this challenge with other challenges. If you would like to check out the challenge and to read all of the rules (I didn’t include them all, but don’t worry, they aren’t extensive or too restrictive) please visit her site. Hopefully I will finish this list early so I can create another list of 50. I still have a ton of books to go before completely the 1001.
(anti-matter is empty)
One of the problems with narcissists, however, is that they do not respect boundaries. They will use private information against you in the workplace, for example. Things that you say in jest or in confidence; or, more correctly, things that you believe were set in jest or in confidence, will often come back to haunt you.
I finished the initial big edit this morning. It will sound overly intricate if I try and explain my method in words - to me it seemed the simplest way of handling a complex revision situation! But: I went through the manuscript from start to finish, doing quite a bit of copy-editing and some story streamlining, editing where I could but marking anything that was too complicated or demanding for me to figure out on the spot on an external card or piece of paper, coded by color depending on what strand of the story it belonged to:
Some people come from a formal church tradition such as Presbyterianism, Lutheranism, Anglicanism, Catholicism, where worship reflected a strong stand on history, usually at the neglect and expense of innovation. I would call this “traditionalism” – where everything we do is based on the way we’ve done things in the past, rather than careful reflection on the historic applications in light of contemporary audiences.
These trees are all over the county.
Last year, the final man of his Graduating Squad from boot camp was killed in action in Afghanistan, making our son the sole survivor of his Squad that graduated from Boot Camp together. I will never forget when our son graduated from Boot Camp, and the Major told all of us parents to look around the room of graduates, and to realize that 50% or more of these kids would not come home except in body bags. That is a slap of reality but the bigger slap is to realize that your son is the sole survivor of his graduating squad. We don’t need one day set aside to remember those that are in harms way today and everyday, and those that didn’t make it back to finish living their lives here back at home, we have a constant reminder that hangs on our wall of those guys that we laughed and talked with prior to their service to our country, and proudly remember them and their surviving family members on a daily basis. We are truly grateful that our son survived, however, being a sole survivor’s parent, it really makes us thankful and humble to have our son, who now has a wife and 2 young boys of his own safe back here at home.
At least, that is the way I saw it.
Multiculturalism is not an ideology of tolerance, but of puritanical self-loathing. Gordon's Labour Party announced to the world
I have been groped again by the TSA. In January of 2011, I was subjected to a humiliating groping at Logan Airport in Boston, where my rump was palpated by the assiduous minions of the TSA. Well, now it’s happened again. This time, before passing through the see-you-naked machine, I removed everything from my pockets except my boarding pass. That included my wallet.
So back to Freeville. I liked seeing how Dickinson's story played out and that even after her husband left her with an infant to run off with his secretary, she had a great life. A fantastic one as did the other women in her family who'd been dealt a bad hand.
Then add capsicum and green chilly slits and saute ..
Yeah, being on a punk label (Chiswick) helped too - in fact Chiswick were just old rockers rather than punks really. But anyway we adopted suitable clothing and it was a fun thing, it wasn’t some sort of alien notion that had nothing to do with us. We got very good at that time though, we were playing 250 gigs a year, so it was very slick.
But, god willing IT WILL HAPPEN ~ & the sooner the better!
“How long, people of South Africa, will you allow this to go on?”
Their breeding grounds are the brush areas of Northern Canada and Western USA.
The above is not intended to disparage DiCaprio, who I think is a strong and versatile actor; Broderick Crawford just has to be himself, though – he’s a winged serpent.
This is a serious practice and this is the more seriously “feeling” of the two books under consideration here, but lest this seem too serious—I would insist that the poems can be read nicely without this note and that Maughn did well to put it at the end. I have seen him read these poems and I have seen him demonstrate karate kata, each standing well for itself.
But Holder and Obama’s anti-Wall Street “law and order” rhetoric has turned out to be a smokescreen that allows the Obama campaign to talk the talk of the 99% while taking money from Wall Street’s 1%. The result is extortion by proxy. As President Obama put it to the Big Finance executives who met with him at the White House just two months into his presidency, “My Administration is the only thing between you and the pitchforks.”
Paris: Great idea! Why don't you make us a couple of those euphorias?
Thank you Aunt Teri and Uncle Richard for helping put a perfect end to a perfectly busy and happily content day we love you!
The morning came in bright and blistering. I showered and dressed and got myself into work at Noon.
Directed By: Joseph Barbera, William Hanna
Wrapped in his sticky sweet love…
I hope you'll try this pretty pink take on the traditional margarita - add chips and salsa and you have one of my favorite dinners...I mean snacks :).
Fold in the drained pasta and pour into a baking dish.
So, there was no small confusion when my Dad interrupted Jim’s kill. People were whispering and muttering, “what does he mean?”, “what better way could there be to kill a snake?”, “has he gone crazy?” Anyway, as people stood there in confusion and amazement, my father stepped out of the crowd and approached the serpent.
Here we go; and, as always, this is in no particular order.
One of my favorite posts is when I feature a designer and their line. To do this one doesn’t have to go far. I found Lana Stepul’s shop at etsy.com. There are so many designs to love, including lots of fresh treatments of black and white…classic summer colors.
To read more about this summer time mix of fresh fruit, Sammy Hagar's Beach Bar Rum and Boulevard Brewing's unfiltered wheat beer, Visit BigKahunaBrew.com
The Gentlemen of Society has developed into a musical powerhouse since their formation in April of 2009 in Belfast. They combined the forces of soulful and majestic guitar virtuoso Nathan Howard with rhythm expert/vocal deity Dominic Williams. From there they added the bass slappin' skills of James Knight and topped it off with a drummer named Wes Sterrs.
our true mother, Jesus, bears us for joy and endless life.
Bought a new camera, the first time in years!
In fairness to Diane Conrad, her article can be found in the Journal of the Canadian Association for Curriculum Studies (4-2) 2006.
chocolate shop/cupcake shop
dance classes proved me horribly wrong. I still think being an actress would be awesome, but I hate exercise and love food, so that doesn't look promising either. Hey, maybe I could write a novel. http://web.me.com/jessieharrell/Site/Destined.html
For those of you who didn’t see the ending of “The Great Pension Fund Hoax”, we discovered that the Social Security trust funds had over $2.5 trillion dollars in the 2009 CAFR. In 2006, that figure was $1.8 trillion. That was an investment return of about $700 billion dollars in just 5 short years.
Sign up below and please make all cheques payable to “CASH”.
These homes are on the market with interested buyers. However, lending programs for as-is properties with deferred maintenance issues have largely disappeared.
Every week a menu is posted and Gutsy cooks choose to cook 1, 2 or all dishes posted in the menu. Then you blog about your experience every Sunday night. Come and cook along with this fun group - be Gutsy!
Why is Virginia’s life and death relevant to Terrible Truth’s pursuit of “Obama” lies?
I used some of my cuttlebug folders for some of the squares and inked over them for that sort of grungy look. I also cut some black squares and put them through my cuttlebug, because I am not sure wether I like that look or not and I may just put them over the inked squares lol. I'm going to run it by my DT hahaha (my girls) to see what they think. If I'm not sure about something I always get their oppinion.
The histories of California of the 1950s and 1960s capture this phenomenon. The father of D.J. Waldie (Holy Land) worked for the Southern California Gas Company designing pipelines for 30 years. Waldie’s neighbors in Lakewood were employed in nearby Long Beach at the Douglas Aircraft plant, which offered practically lifetime employment. In the major cities throughout the state, Kevin Starr (Golden Dreams: California in an Age of Abundance, 1950-1963) found confident new enterprises, fueling the state’s middle class with both stable blue-collar and white-collar jobs.
Mocknick: What they don't mention is that these agents generally will not accept new writers unless they're already bestsellers.
“Soooooo, what’s your problem Mr. Switchblade?”
Correction & Amplification:
Heat the oil and fry the bittergourd unitl golden.
Silver: Whale Tail Wit, Dry Dock Brewing Co., Aurora, CO
The indications are very strong that we shall move in a few days—perhaps tomorrow. Lest I should not be able to write again, I feel impelled to write a few lines that may fall under your eye when I shall be no more . . .
Maximum of 4 Flowers
Santorum: damn right - I hate all
I wanted to see him do more miracles; and so, just for the pleasure of hearing him answer, I asked him about Hertzegovina, and pariah, and unique. But he began to generalize then, and show distress. I saw that with New Zealand gone, he was a Samson shorn of his locks; he was as other men. This was a curious and interesting mystery, and I was frank with him, and asked him to explain it.
Fortunately, they gave all of us (over 2,000 of us) 3 days to do it all in.
The plowing is only a fraction of the skill. Farmers in the day knew what was really going on. Today agribusiness is no different from a production line. It’s all external process and algorithms. It’s Ikea.
I'm meant to name seven more bloggers for this award.
The artists and bands from all parts of the world perform acoustically, some in the woods, some near abandoned railroad lines, some on the street, in and around London mostly... and sometimes using whatever is handy to strum upon to keep the beat.
4) *little* sugar
A huge, huge missed opportunity to make the million dollar question “So who is coming down the pub?”, at the end I got my well thumbed copy of the book signed and Chris kindly wrote “apart from you” while Geoff wrote knowingly “ we told you so”.
Did I tell you about the girls latest orthodontic visits. Where they had their palate expanders put in? Or how I listened to the girls whine and moan for two weeks about how everything was getting stuck on the roof of their mouth?
And speaking of JBS Mercantile kits, I have been asked to join their design team! I am TOTALLY excited about this opportunity! I was telling my husband about how much I was loving my new kit club just two days before I was asked to join. Awesomeness!!
I know it has been five plus weeks since my last post. When I returned home from Florida, we picked up Libby our Miniature Schnauzer. She wasn’t acting herself and had lost weight and her eyes were runny. I took her to the vet the next day thinking she had an eye infection. Unfortunately, I was given the news that she had Lymphoma. The prognosis was not good, but I did expect to have a couple more months with her. She had perked up some and was eating good and seeming not to know she was sick.
I pointed out elsewhere a review of the film in the Guardian Unlimited, but more eloquent than words are the dazzlingly beautiful photographs reproduced in two now out-of-print books but fortunately made available online for all to see:
The challenge for the next 2 weeks is "sparkle and bling", it doesn't have to be a Christmas project , anything you like as long as it fits the theme and remember to include something stamped. We have had a couple of entries in the past few weeks which haven't included stamping.
KT asked me the other day what I wanted for Valentine's Day, I guess he is trying to go all romantic on me after all these years, but I told him, if you have to ask, then don't bother. My love languages, are service, time and touch. I think he has a lot more work cut out for him than buying me a simple gift...
What’s your most challenging goal right now?
Pre-heat the oven to 375. Pinch the dough into balls - I like bigger Naans. Stretch each ball by hand into an oval shape, and place on a buttered cookie sheet. Bake them for 3-4 minutes: they should get bubbles in them. When the dough looks 'done', place on a grill or under a broiler for a short amount of time to 'brown' the bubbles.
DON’T MESS WITH HEXES
The three-day gathering, titled Managing risk in emerging pork markets: A South-South Symposium saw participants share short papers and presentations on the lessons learnt from the following key areas:
Now I laugh. Beautiful? My skin is so fair, I’m surprised I don’t burst into flames in the sun. Maybe she means my unruly, dark waves that I can barely tame into a pony tail, my standard daily hairstyle. Summer is the gorgeous one, hair—blond, straight. Skin—flawless honey. Her parents ran the risk of making her a cliché, but she owns it—the look, the name, all of it.
Mbeki's claims that vast numbers of whites out there call blacks "kaffirs" and flatten their noses in racist caricatures are tantamount to anti-white propaganda.
The next time you see a couple of four years olds wandering suggest that they work together fetching and pairing. It has been my experience that they are initially suspect that you are actually inviting them to work together let alone move back and forth across the room. Soon, this work will be done daily and it will become part of the natural flow of the classroom. Yet, 4 year olds wander and perhaps this provides the mental rest their minds need to absorb and process knowledge. I am remembering again the t-shirt that read, “All who wander are not lost.” I need to get one of those.
Thankfully, Robyn seems to be finding her own way. If anything she’s taking after me, only with Renee’s intelligence and a quicksilver wit. My little sisters will grow up to be amazing human beings, so long as they can do it and stay true to themselves.
Lo + behold, I found an old paint brush. Just started
On the other hand however, the media industry is transforming so rapidly that it has become more unstable and unpredictable than ever before.
I really liked this story. I finished the series within a week, because everytime I try to stop, I want to know what happens after so I ended up reading it a lot. Apart from time at school, I spent most of my free time reading it.
Politicians bombard us with the idea that a change is necessary for this or that office and perhaps I would say that is a good thing. Some enjoy a change of the seasons. Where I live we have an extra season--NFL football season. Others brag about the warmth most of the year around. (They don't talk about the 100 degree summers) We all enjoy a change of scene to go on vacation, new clothes, and some variety in our lives, but we pretty much want the basics to stay the way they are. That is, if your basics are good and not if you are out of a job or homeless. Some have changes in marital status. Kids have to go through mom and dad's divorce or the death of one of the parents or a sibling.
A brief, startling moment of captivity, the body
Bonnie Princ Billy – Joy and Jubilee – Ease on Down the Road (2001)
I had this moment … that I realized despite what was happening to this man in front of me, I’d been more concerned with the composition of my (photo) shot than I was with any attempt to either save him or at the very, very least ease his passing.
The green jets out like an island of its own with water surrounding it. From the middle of the fairway, players are usually left with 120-140 yards to the green. If you slice your ball off the tee, you will be left with a long shot, 150-170 yards to the green. It’s almost better to lay up and use a wedge to drop your ball on the green because it isn’t a very big putting surface.
Badfinger suicide,
The rest of my day (till now) was spent chatting with old friends,painting my nails bright and orange (that makes me happy),organizing some old photographs,playing computer games,re arranging my wardrobe etc.
Place tops on the containers, and leave for 24 hours. Place into freezer, and store frozen until ready to use.
This is my first official post…wow so surreal. I have been working on perfecting this blog for a while now and will hopefully purchase the domain name soon!
We have left so much undone at the close of each day…
Finally, consider eating smaller portions of fish, rather than a large fillet or steak at one sitting. Even if the seafood is expensive, just manage your portion size so it becomes more affordable. The health benefits far outweigh the financial cost so you need to find ways to eat more fish.
Here he is unwrapping them with many offers of help to demonstrate them!
It's finally Wednesday!! I think I'm really going to like Wednesdays for the next few weeks because I get to SLEEP IN til 7:30!!! Wooohooo! It's funny how 1 week of grad school can make 7:30 "sleeping in." Only one 4 hour lecture today!! :-)
Cashier Station (several positions)
The office of housing for urban development or commonly know as HUD has and does deal with the poor who are mainly minority and are the families that Mitt Romney previously has said.”he does not care about as they have a safety net already.” This is mainly a group that do not vote Republican but instead vote for the Democrats. HUD is one of those safety nets whose job it is to protect the poor against the greed of Apartment owners.
Anyhow.....
Skin becomes coarse, dry, scaly, and thick
In 1959, there were about 4,245,000 births in the U.S. Today, a baby is born every 7 seconds, resulting in about 4,138,349 births a year.
and on that note, say goodnight, Gracie.
We’re back at The Plough this Wednesday for more fun and food with the inimitable Sam Fuss from True South Brewery as my very special guest. Fresh from her guest spot on Radio Brews News, Sam will introduce the locals to the Red Truck Marzen and no doubt regale them with tales of her 11 years at the forefront of the Australian brewing scene.
If gender is not an issue for society anymore, the question was posed: Why are 90 per cent of company managers male, and 90 per cent of secretaries female?
Ah, yes...Ella.
Location: Charlottesville, VA
in the inmost shrine of my heart.
The 7th Voyage of Sinbad was part of a movie vogue that was petering out by the time it went into production in 1957: the Arabian Nights adventure. The genre -- at least this incarnation of it -- had begun in 1940 with the phenomenal success of the marvelous, magical The Thief of Bagdad from Alexander Korda's London Films. It spurred a flood of similarly-themed adventures throughout the '40s -- most noticeably in a series of campy Technicolor romps from Universal starring Jon Hall and Maria Montez ("the King and Queen of Technicolor"), but cropping up in other unexpected places, like MGM's Kismet (1944) with Ronald Colman and Marlene Dietrich, and Warner Bros.' update of The Desert Song (1943), with Dennis Morgan as a burnoose-clad freedom fighter battling Nazis in war-torn Morocco.
And I really, REALLY hope the icky feeling I have right now doesn't mean I'm getting it too. :x
I want to chase after you,
Fit: Like Aimee's description says, these covers run on the small side. The Large fits Charlotte but is a tight fit on her large thighs. This makes it hard to put on sometimes. There is also a gap at the back of the cover and you can see the top of her diaper (the diaper doesn't stick out but since the cover doesn't have much stretchiness to it, it doesn't conform to her skin). This doesn't affect how the cover works; it's just aestetical. Perhaps some adjustments could be made or another size added. Maybe a stretchy top?
Mike: I’m going to read now.
This was a really delicious and simple baklava - although it makes a big baklava so I recommend inviting lots of friends over to help you eat it! Check out the recipe here.
Here's another example of googling under the influence. And it's DUCT tape, people!!!
FURTHER RESEARCH
Lionsgate’s home entertainment business is an industry leader in box office-to-DVD and box office-to-VOD revenue conversion rate. Lionsgate handles a prestigious and prolific library of approximately 13,000 motion picture and television titles that is an important source of recurring revenue and serves as the foundation for the growth of the Company’s core businesses. The Lionsgate and Summit brands remain synonymous with original, daring, quality entertainment in markets around the world.
I suppose the best place to start would be a short synopsis of the first film Suicide Club, which was filmed first but is sort of a sequel and prequel to Noriko’s Dinner Table. Written and directed by Sion Sono as a commentary to the growing number of suicides in Japan, the film is centered around mass suicides that begin occurring all over Japan. With the most publicized tragedy occurring at Shinjuku Station where 54 high school girls happily throw themselves in front of a moving train simultaneously. These tragedies sparks confusion and mass hysteria, prompting the police to get involved to discover their motives. I will say that the deep and heavy subject matter borders on a slasher film with it’s gory scenes showing in detail the people committing suicide. The basic plot on a deeper level deals mainly with the generation gap and a growing number of teenagers and families feeling alienated and disenchanted.
These freeze well. Cover each pan of rolls with foil, then put in a gallon sized resealable bag.
The book contains over 200 poems mostly by different authors, although there is more than one contribution from a few (including Shelley and Auden). It’s a mixture of the familiar and the brand new, including some commissioned especially for this book. I couldn’t possibly write about the whole, but a few things struck me as I sampled various tidbits.
Right now when an album goes out of print it just disappears and any reference to a song in a playlist gets grayed out. What I wished is for these services to give a last call notice before this happens and let us decide if we want to buy the CD or MP3 album, and move that to a cloud music site for lifetime storage. Again, another reason for music subscription services to offer cloud music storage – the synergy would be so great.
I’m not sorry for anything that I’ve ever said to anyone,
If I stay in here much longer, I'll have a disease for every day of the week.
I squinted up into that very bright light that halo'd his face and was told that he would have to
kids dancing in the aisles.
Next Week: From Klan to Clandestine
Moons eyes scanned around the beach, the only Mod friend that he could see beneath the early morning sun was Shag the tiny Jack Russell! Moon left the heels of his master and bounded up to him, nervous with anticipation!
Shortly after the grant announcements, I was contacted by an editor who was interested in reading the manuscript. Funny enough, I didn’t feel it was ready to be seen yet but told her I’d send it when it was. In January of this year, I attended the SCBWI Winter Conference in New York. I introduced myself to that editor who asked again when I was going to send the manuscript. She also asked me if I had an agent and instructed me to introduce myself to Michael Bourret, who also happened to be at the conference.
So the new home he went to filed all the necessary paperwork for the transfer, only somewhere along the bureaucratic nightmare of tangled webs the whole thing got lost.
Canada Only.
“What’s going on?” Her voice was shaking by the end of her question. She knew where I was.
We all know it’s going to happen but for some reason we want to cling on to life. I wonder, is it the fear of the unknown? is it because we’ve got so much going for us we don’t want to let it go? or is it for fear of what we’re going to leave behind?
Emily Tennant ... Sarah Burton
So we end this book with a second part beckoning - I think up to part 3 has been published. Will I read the others? Have to say I'm not dashing out and lining them up... shame I thought I'd really like this but it just wasn't multi-dimensional enough for me.
Anno 1050 was on tap recently. I reccomend that, the barok helles, this weissen, the assam bock and possibly the pilsner and dunkle wiessen. they used to be sold at Yamaya but that may have changed now.
Have to love the Kindle App for ipad and you can also put the app on your Mac computer (and on your iphone too), so was able to buy and download the books almost instantly through Amazon!
I still hear that old saw, "when the bad guy hears my 12 gauge pump racking, they wet their pants."
Slice horizontally the cooled down cake into four, if you have baked in one 9"pan, or slice each cake into two if you have baked it in two 6" pans. Sandwich the layers with the prepared filling and refrigerate for about 20 minutes before frosting it with the ganache.
90. Stolen Property - Low Rider (3:06)
Myristic Acid – Organic acid in most animal and vegetable fats. In butter acids. Used in shampoos, creams, cosmetics. In food flavorings. Derivatives: Isopropyl Myristate, Myristal Ether Sulfate, Myristyls, Oleyl Myristate. Alternatives: nut butters, oil of lovage, coconut oil, extract from seed kernels of nutmeg, etc.
I create abundance in my life by consistently following up and following through. I trust the process of life and creation and know everything unfolds in its divine time and order. I do my part the best I know how by allowing integrity to be my constant guide.
But I feel the weight of what it brings, and the hurt that tries to grab
Cut dough into sections and shape as desired, into loaves, rolls, English muffins, pizza shells … See below for details.
First, a teeny tiny bit of housekeeping, namely that I have started a humor blog and if you are so inclined to check it out, you may visit it here.
My self esteem has been raised tremendously
The second one is in certain businesses they have manual over-ride on certain machines in case they fail to function properly. My life failed to function and I practice a recovery program as my own version of manual over ride.
"I could heat it up for you," she said as she walked into the adjoining kitchen.
I am giving multiple gift cards to my daughter and her fiancé- nothing extravagant but enough for the two of them to have four different simple meals this winter without spending a lot of money or making a lot of fuss. I wanted to do something along the lines of recipe cards- so broke the cards down to coffee, salad, soup, poultry and fish- to correspond to the gift cards. I used an old jewelry gift box and covered it in BoBunny paper and made the fold out section with kraft paper- I used the From My Kitchen Cartridge and for the top made a medallion with layered snowflakes for the Winter Lace Cartridge. I was pretty happy with it and will be using this idea in the future- probably similar for my son’s high school graduation gift.
Col 1:21 And you, that were sometime alienated and enemies in your mind by wicked works, yet now hath he reconciled 22 In the body of his flesh through death, to present you holy and unblameable and unreproveable in his sight: 23 If ye continue in the faith grounded and settled, and be not moved away from the hope of the gospel, which ye have heard, and which was preached to every creature which is under heaven; whereof I Paul am made a minister;
These school holiday sojourns have been taking place almost every school holiday since out eldest children started school in 1995.
Here are some sneeky peeks of my DT piece:
Tickle.
thanks for reading...
Congratulations to Missouri on once again being associated with backwards ignorance and deception.
this is what she came up with!! along with a sketch (to scale) of exactly where to put my furniture, and a complete source list, with links, of what accessories to purchase, where to purchase them and where to put them in the room.
The other day, I wrote about how I recently purchased two pairs of wedges even though it’s not typically a style I gravitate to – something about how they tend to lean towards being chunky and tacky tends to turn me off – but since then, I’ve seen my fair share of really cute ones out and about.
The most difficult for us i think was that we didnt know each other well enough to understand each others actions at the time. Like now without us speaking , we can both understand what the other one is feeling. We can look more into it without even talking.
I used 2 types of dragees ~ pink metallic and pink pearls but not together.
1 (or 2) can of chopped clams
